th: ประเทศ: อัฟกานิสถาน; แอลเบเนีย; แอลจีเรีย; อันดอร์รา; แองโกลา; แองกวิลลา; แอนติกาและบาร์บูดา; อาร์เจนตินา; อาร์เมเนีย; อารูบา; เกาะอัสเซนชัน; ออสเตรเลีย; ออสเตรีย; อาเซอร์ไบจาน; บาฮามาส; บาห์เรน; บังกลาเทศ; บาร์เบโดส; เบลารุส; เบลเยียม; เบลีซ; เบนิน; เบอร์มิวดา; ภูฏาน; โบลิเวีย; บอสเนียและเฮอร์เซโกวีนา; บอตสวานา; บราซิล; บริติชอินเดียนโอเชียนเทร์ริทอรี; หมู่เกาะบริติชเวอร์จิน; บรูไน; บัลแกเรีย; บูร์กินาฟาโซ; บุรุนดี; กัมพูชา; แคเมอรูน; แคนาดา; เคปเวิร์ด; แคริบเบียนเนเธอร์แลนด์; หมู่เกาะเคย์เเมน; สาธารณรัฐแอฟริกากลาง; ชาด; ชิลี; จีน; เกาะคริสต์มาส; หมู่เกาะโคโคส (คีลิง); โคลอมเบีย; คอโมโรส; คองโก - บราซซาวิล; คองโก - กินชาซา; หมู่เกาะคุก; คอสตาริกา; โครเอเชีย; คูราเซา; ไซปรัส; เช็กเกีย; สาธารณรัฐโกตดิวัวร์; เดนมาร์ก; จิบูตี; โดมินิกา; สาธารณรัฐโดมินิกัน; เอกวาดอร์; อียิปต์; เอลซัลวาดอร์; อิเควทอเรียลกินี; เอริเทรีย; เอสโตเนีย; เอสวาตินี; เอธิโอเปีย; หมู่เกาะฟอล์กแลนด์; หมู่เกาะแฟโร; ฟิจิ; ฟินแลนด์; ฝรั่งเศส; เฟรนช์เกียนา; เฟรนช์พอลินีเชีย; เฟรนช์เซาเทิร์นเทร์ริทอรีส์; กาบอง; แกมเบีย; จอร์เจีย; เยอรมนี; กานา; ยิบรอลตาร์; กรีซ; กรีนแลนด์; เกรเนดา; กวาเดอลูป; กัวเตมาลา; เกิร์นซีย์; กินี; กินี-บิสเซา; กายอานา; เฮติ; ฮอนดูรัส; เขตปกครองพิเศษฮ่องกง; ฮังการี; ไอซ์แลนด์; อินเดีย; อินโดนีเซีย; อิรัก; ไอร์แลนด์; ไอล์ออฟแมน; อิสราเอล; อิตาลี; จาเมกา; ญี่ปุ่น; เจอร์ซีย์; จอร์แดน; คาซัคสถาน; เคนยา; คิริบาส; โคโซโว; คูเวต; คีร์กีซสถาน; ลาว; ลัตเวีย; เลบานอน; เลโซโท; ไลบีเรีย; ลิเบีย; ลิกเตนสไตน์; ลิทัวเนีย; ลักเซมเบิร์ก; เขตบริหารพิเศษมาเก๊า; มาดากัสการ์; มาลาวี; มาเลเซีย; มัลดีฟส์; มาลี; มอลตา; มาร์ตีนีก; มอริเตเนีย; มอริเชียส; มายอต; เม็กซิโก; มอลโดวา; โมนาโก; มองโกเลีย; มอนเตเนโกร; มอนต์เซอร์รัต; โมร็อกโก; โมซัมบิก; เมียนมาร์ (พม่า); นามิเบีย; นาอูรู; เนปาล; เนเธอร์แลนด์; นิวแคลิโดเนีย; นิวซีแลนด์; นิการากัว; ไนเจอร์; ไนจีเรีย; นีอูเอ; เกาะนอร์ฟอล์ก; มาซิโดเนียเหนือ; นอร์เวย์; โอมาน; ปากีสถาน; ดินแดนปาเลสไตน์; ปานามา; ปาปัวนิวกินี; ปารากวัย; เปรู; ฟิลิปปินส์; หมู่เกาะพิตแคร์น; โปแลนด์; โปรตุเกส; กาตาร์; โรมาเนีย; รัสเซีย; รวันดา; เรอูนียง; ซามัว; ซานมารีโน; ซาอุดิอาระเบีย; เซเนกัล; เซอร์เบีย; เซเชลส์; เซียร์ราลีโอน; สิงคโปร์; ซินต์มาร์เติน; สโลวาเกีย; สโลวีเนีย; หมู่เกาะโซโลมอน; โซมาเลีย; แอฟริกาใต้; เกาะเซาท์จอร์เจียและหมู่เกาะเซาท์แซนด์วิช; เกาหลีใต้; ซูดานใต้; สเปน; ศรีลังกา; แซงบาร์เตเลมี; เซนต์เฮเลนา; เซนต์คิตส์และเนวิส; เซนต์ลูเซีย; เซนต์มาร์ติน; แซงปีแยร์และมีเกอลง; เซนต์วินเซนต์และเกรนาดีนส์; ซูดาน; ซูรินาม; สฟาลบาร์และยานไมเอน; สวีเดน; สวิตเซอร์แลนด์; เซาตูเมและปรินซิปี; ไต้หวัน; ทาจิกิสถาน; แทนซาเนีย; ไทย; ติมอร์-เลสเต; โทโก; โตเกเลา; ตองกา; ตรินิแดดและโตเบโก; ตริสตันดากูนยา; ตูนิเซีย; เติร์กเมนิสถาน; หมู่เกาะเติกส์และเคคอส; ตูวาลู; ตุรกี; หมู่เกาะรอบนอกของสหรัฐอเมริกา; ยูกันดา; ยูเครน; สหรัฐอาหรับเอมิเรตส์; สหราชอาณาจักร; สหรัฐอเมริกา; อุรุกวัย; อุซเบกิสถาน; วานูอาตู; นครรัฐวาติกัน; เวเนซุเอลา; เวียดนาม; วาลลิสและฟุตูนา; เวสต์เทิร์นซาฮาร่า; เยเมน; แซมเบีย; ซิมบับเว; หมู่เกาะโอลันด์; อื่นๆ
ko: 국가: 아프가니스탄; 알바니아; 알제리; 안도라; 앙골라; 앵귈라; 앤티가 바부다; 아르헨티나; 아르메니아; 아루바; 어센션 섬; 호주; 오스트리아; 아제르바이잔; 바하마; 바레인; 방글라데시; 바베이도스; 벨라루스; 벨기에; 벨리즈; 베냉; 버뮤다; 부탄; 볼리비아; 보스니아 헤르체고비나; 보츠와나; 브라질; 영국령 인도양 지역; 영국령 버진아일랜드; 브루나이; 불가리아; 부르키나파소; 부룬디; 캄보디아; 카메룬; 캐나다; 카보베르데; 카리브해 네덜란드; 케이맨 제도; 중앙 아프리카 공화국; 차드; 칠레; 중국; 크리스마스 섬; 코코스(킬링) 제도; 콜롬비아; 코모로; 콩고 - 브라자빌; 콩고 - 킨샤사; 쿡 제도; 코스타리카; 크로아티아; 퀴라소; 사이프러스; 체코; 코트디부아르; 덴마크; 지부티; 도미니카; 도미니카 공화국; 에콰도르; 이집트; 엘살바도르; 적도기니; 에리트레아; 에스토니아; 에스와티니; 에티오피아; 포클랜드 제도; 페로 제도; 피지; 핀란드; 프랑스; 프랑스령 기아나; 프랑스령 폴리네시아; 프랑스 남부 지역; 가봉; 감비아; 조지아; 독일; 가나; 지브롤터; 그리스; 그린란드; 그레나다; 과들루프; 과테말라; 건지; 기니; 기니비사우; 가이아나; 아이티; 온두라스; 홍콩; 헝가리; 아이슬란드; 인도; 인도네시아; 이라크; 아일랜드; 맨 섬; 이스라엘; 이탈리아; 자메이카; 일본; 저지; 요르단; 카자흐스탄; 케냐; 키리바시; 코소보; 쿠웨이트; 키르기스스탄; 라오스; 라트비아; 레바논; 레소토; 라이베리아; 리비아; 리히텐슈타인; 리투아니아; 룩셈부르크; 마카오; 마다가스카르; 말라위; 말레이시아; 몰디브; 말리; 몰타; 마르티니크; 모리타니; 모리셔스; 마요트; 멕시코; 몰도바; 모나코; 몽골리아; 몬테네그로; 몬세라트; 모로코; 모잠비크; 미얀마; 나미비아; 나우루; 네팔; 네덜란드; 뉴 칼레도니아; 뉴질랜드; 니카라과; 니제르; 나이지리아; 니우에; 노퍽 섬; 북마케도니아; 노르웨이; 오만; 파키스탄; 팔레스타인; 파나마; 파푸아뉴기니; 파라과이; 페루; 필리핀; 핏케언 제도; 폴란드; 포르투갈; 카타르; 루마니아; 러시아; 르완다; 레위니옹; 사모아; 산마리노; 사우디아라비아; 세네갈; 세르비아; 세이셸; 시에라리온; 싱가포르; 신트마르턴; 슬로바키아; 슬로베니아; 솔로몬제도; 소말리아; 남아프리카공화국; 사우스조지아 사우스샌드위치 제도; 대한민국; 남수단; 스페인; 스리랑카; 생 바르텔레미; 세인트 헬레나; 세인트 키츠 네비스; 세인트루시아; 세인트 마틴; 생 피에르 앤 미클롱; 세인트빈센트 그레나딘; 수단; 수리남; 스발바르 얀마옌 제도; 스웨덴; 스위스; 상투메 프린시페; 대만; 타지키스탄; 탄자니아; 태국; 동티모르; 토고; 토켈라우; 통가; 트리니다드 토바고; 트리스탄 다 쿠냐; 튀니지; 투르크메니스탄; 터크스 케이커스 제도; 투발루; 튀르키예; 미국령 군소 제도; 우간다; 우크라이나; 아랍에미리트; 영국; 미국; 우루과이; 우즈베키스탄; 바누아투; 바티칸 시국; 베네수엘라; 베트남; 월리스푸투나; 서부 사하라; 예멘; 잠비아; 짐바브웨; 올란드 제도; 기타
sv: Land: Afghanistan; Albanien; Algeriet; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antigua & Barbuda; Argentina; Armenien; Aruba; Ascension Island; Australien; Österrike; Azerbajdzjan; Bahamas; Bahrain; Bangladesh; Barbados; Belarus; Belgien; Belize; Benin; Bermuda; Bhutan; Bolivia; Bosnien och Hercegovina; Botswana; Brasilien; Brittiska territoriet i Indiska oceanen; Brittiska Jungfruöarna; Brunei; Bulgaria; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Kambodja; Kamerun; Kanada; Cap Verde; Karibiska Nederländerna; Caymanöarna; Centralafrikanska republiken; Tchad; Chile; Kina; Julön; Cocos (Keeling) Islands; Colombia; Komorerna; Kongo - Brazzaville; Kongo - Kinshasa; Cooköarna; Costa Rica; Kroatien; Curaçao; Cypern; Tjeckien; Elfenbenskusten; Danmark; Djibouti; Dominica; Dominikanska republiken; Ecuador; Egypten; El Salvador; Ekvatorialguinea; Eritrea; Estland; Eswatini; Etiopien; Falklandsöarna; Färöarna; Fiji; Finland; Frankrike; Franska Guyana; Franska Polynesien; Franska sydterritorierna; Gabon; Gambia; Georgien; Tyskland; Ghana; Gibraltar; Grekland; Grönland; Grenada; Guadeloupe; Guatemala; Guernsey; Guinea; Guinea-Bissau; Guyana; Haiti; Honduras; Hong Kong SAR; Ungern; Island; Indien; Indonesien; Iraq; Irland; Isle of Man; Israel; Italien; Jamaica; Japan; Jersey; Jordan; Kazakhstan; Kenya; Kiribati; Kosovo; Kuwait; Kyrgyzstan; Laos; Latvia; Lebanon; Lesotho; Liberia; Libya; Liechtenstein; Litauen; Luxemburg; Macao SAR; Madagaskar; Malawi; Malaysia; Maldiverna; Mali; Malta; Martinique; Mauritania; Mauritius; Mayotte; Mexiko; Moldavien; Monaco; Mongoliet; Montenegro; Montserrat; Marocko; Moçambique; Myanmar (Burma); Namibia; Nauru; Nepal; Nederländerna; Nya Kaledonien; Nya Zeeland; Nicaragua; Niger; Nigeria; Niue; Norfolkön; Nordmakedonien; Norge; Oman; Pakistan; Palestinska territorier; Panama; Papua Nya Guinea; Paraguay; Peru; Filippinerna; Pitcairnöarna; Polen; Portugal; Qatar; Rumänien; Ryssland; Rwanda; Réunion; Samoa; San Marino; Saudi Arabia; Senegal; Serbia; Seychellerna; Sierra Leone; Singapore; Sint Maarten; Slovakien; Slovenien; Salomonöarna; Somalia; Sydafrika; Sydgeorgien och Sydsandwichöarna; Sydkorea; Södra Sudan; Spanien; Sri Lanka; St Barthélemy; St Helena; St Kitts och Nevis; St Lucia; St Martin; St Pierre och Miquelon; Saint Vincent och Grenadinerna; Sudan; Surinam; Svalbard och Jan Mayen; Sverige; Schweiz; São Tomé & Príncipe; Taiwan; Tajikistan; Tanzania; Thailand; Östtimor; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad och Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunisien; Turkmenistan; Turks- och Caicosöarna; Tuvalu; Turkiet; USA:s yttre öar; Uganda; Ukraina; Förenade arabemiraten; Storbritannien; USA; Uruguay; Uzbekistan; Vanuatu; Vatikanstaten; Venezuela; Vietnam; Wallis- och Futunaöarna; Västra Sahara; Jemen; Zambia; Zimbabwe; Åland; Övrigt
lt-LT: Šalis: Afganistanas; Albanija; Alžyras; Andora; Angola; Angilija; Antigva ir Barbuda; Argentina; Armėnija; Aruba; Asensjono sala; Australija; Austrija; Azerbaidžanas; Bahamos; Bahreinas; Bangladešas; Barbadosas; Baltarusija; Belgija; Belizas; Beninas; Bermuda; Butanas; Bolivija; Bosnija ir Hercegovina; Botsvana; Brazilija; Indijos Vandenyno Britų Sritis; Britų Mergelių salos; Brunėjus; Bulgarija; Burkina Fasas; Burundis; Kambodža; Kamerūnas; Kanada; Žaliasis Kyšulys; Karibų Nyderlandai; Kaimanų salos; Centrinės Afrikos Respublika; Čadas; Čilė; Kinija; Kalėdų sala; Kokosų (Kilingo) salos; Kolumbija; Komorosas; Kongas – Brazavilis; Kongas – Kinšasa; Kuko salos; Kosta Rika; Kroatija; Kiurasao; Kipras; Čekija; Dramblio Kaulo Krantas; Danija; Džibutis; Dominika; Dominikos Respublika; Ekvadoras; Egiptas; Salvadoras; Ekvatoriaus Gvinėja; Eritrėja; Estija; Svazilandas; Etiopija; Folklando salos; Farerų salos; Fidžis; Suomija; Prancūzija; Prancūzijos Gviana; Prancūzijos Polinezija; Prancūzijos Pietų Sritys; Gabonas; Gambija; Sakartvelas; Vokietija; Gana; Gibraltaras; Graikija; Grenlandija; Grenada; Gvadelupa; Gvatemala; Gernsis; Gvinėja; Bisau Gvinėja; Gajana; Haitis; Hondūras; Honkongo SAR; Vengrija; Islandija; Indija; Indonezija; Irakas; Airija; Meno sala; Izraelis; Italija; Jamaika; Japonija; Džersis; Jordanija; Kazachstanas; Kenija; Kiribatis; Kosovas; Kuveitas; Kirgizija; Laosas; Latvija; Libanas; Lesotas; Liberija; Libija; Lichtenšteinas; Lietuva; Liuksemburgas; Makao SAR; Madagaskaras; Malavis; Malaizija; Maldyvai; Malis; Malta; Martinika; Mauritanija; Mauricijus; Majotas; Meksika; Moldova; Monakas; Mongolija; Juodkalnija; Montseratas; Marokas; Mozambikas; Mianmaras (Birma); Namibija; Nauru; Nepalas; Nyderlandai; Naujoji Kaledonija; Naujoji Zelandija; Nikaragva; Nigeris; Nigerija; Niujė; Norfolko sala; Šiaurės Makedonija; Norvegija; Omanas; Pakistanas; Palestinos teritorijos; Panama; Papua Naujoji Gvinėja; Paragvajus; Peru; Filipinai; Pitkerno salos; Lenkija; Portugalija; Kataras; Rumunija; Rusija; Ruanda; Reunjonas; Samoa; San Marinas; Saudo Arabija; Senegalas; Serbija; Seišeliai; Siera Leonė; Singapūras; Sint Martenas; Slovakija; Slovėnija; Saliamono salos; Somalis; Pietų Afrika; Pietų Džordžijos ir Pietųų Sándvičo salos; Pietų Korėja; Pietų Sudanas; Ispanija; Šri Lanka; Šv. Bartolomėjaus sala; Šv. Elena; Sent Kitsastsas ir Nevis; Sent Lusija; Šv. Martyno sala; Sen Pjeras ir Mikelonas; Sent Vinsentas ir Grenadinai; Sudanas; Surinamas; Svalbardas ir Janas Mayenas; Švedija; Šveicarija; San Tomė ir Prinsipė; Taivanas; Tadžikistanas; Tanzanija; Tailandas; Rytų Timoras; Togas; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidadas ir Tobagas; Tristanas da Kunja; Tunisas; Turkmėnistanas; Terkso ir Kaikoso salos; Tuvalu; Turkija; Jungtinių Valstijų Tolimosios Salos; Uganda; Ukraina; Jungtiniai Arabų Emyratai; Jungtinė Karalystė; Jungtinės Valstijos; Urugvajus; Uzbekistanas; Vanuatu; Vatikanas; Venesuela; Vietnamas; Volisas ir Futūna; Vakarų Sachara; Jemenas; Zambija; Zimbabvė; Alandų salos; Kita
da: Land: Afghanistan; Albanien; Algeriet; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antigua & Barbuda; Argentina; Armenien; Aruba; Ascension; Australien; Østrig; Aserbajdsjan; Bahamas; Bahrain; Bangladesh; Barbados; Belarus; Belgien; Belize; Benin; Bermuda; Bhutan; Bolivia; Bosnien-Hercegovina; Botswana; Brasilien; Britisk territorium i det Indiske Ocean; Britiske Jomfruøer; Brunei; Bulgarien; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Cambodja; Cameroun; Canada; Kap Verde; Caribisk Nederlandene; Caymanøerne; Den Centralafrikanske Republik; Tchad; Chile; Kina; Juleøen; Cocosøerne; Colombia; Comorerne; Congo – Brazzaville; Congo – Kinshasa; Cookøerne; Costa Rica; Kroatien; Curaçao; Cypern; Tjekkiet; Elfenbenskysten; Danmark; Djibouti; Dominica; Den dominikanske republik; Ecuador; Egypten; El Salvador; Ækvatorial Guinea; Eritrea; Estland; Eswatini; Etiopien; Falklandsøerne; Færøerne; Fiji; Finland; Frankrig; Fransk Guyana; Fransk Polynesien; Franske sydlige territorier; Gabon; Gambia; Georgien; Tyskland; Ghana; Gibraltar; Grækenland; Grønland; Grenada; Guadeloupe; Guatemala; Guernsey; Guinea; Guinea-Bissau; Guyana; Haiti; Honduras; Hong Kong SAR; Ungarn; Island; Indien; Indonesien; Irak; Irland; Isle of Man; Israel; Italien; Jamaica; Japan; Jersey; Jordan; Kazakhstan; Kenya; Kiribati; Kosovo; Kuwait; Kyrgyzstan; Laos; Letland; Libanon; Lesotho; Liberia; Libyen; Liechtenstein; Litauen; Luxembourg; Macao SAR; Madagascar; Malawi; Malaysia; Maldiverne; Mali; Malta; Martinique; Mauretanien; Mauritius; Mayotte; Mexico; Moldova; Monaco; Mongoliet; Montenegro; Montserrat; Marokko; Mozambique; Myanmar (Burma); Namibia; Nauru; Nepal; Holland; Ny Kaledonien; New Zealand; Nicaragua; Niger; Nigeria; Niue; Norfolk Island; Nordmakedonien; Norge; Oman; Pakistan; Palæstinensiske territorier; Panama; Papua Ny Guinea; Paraguay; Peru; Filippinerne; Pitcairn-øerne; Polen; Portugal; Qatar; Rumænien; Rusland; Rwanda; Réunion; Samoa; San Marino; Saudi Arabien; Senegal; Serbien; Seychellerne; Sierra Leone; Singapore; Sint Maarten; Slovakiet; Slovenien; Salomonøerne; Somalia; Sydafrika; South Georgia og South Sandwich Islands; Sydkorea; Sydsudan; Spanien; Sri Lanka; Saint Barthélemy; Sankt Helena; Saint Kitts og Nevis; Saint Lucia; Saint Martin; Saint-Pierre og Miquelon; Saint Vincent og Grenadinerne; Sudan; Surinam; Svalbard og Jan Mayen; Sverige; Schweiz; São Tomé & Príncipe; Taiwan; Tadsjikistan; Tanzania; Thailand; Timor-Leste; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad og Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunesien; Turkmenistan; Turks- og Caicosøerne; Tuvalu; Tyrkiet; USA's ydre småøer; Uganda; Ukraine; De Forenede Arabiske Emirater; Storbritannien; USA; Uruguay; Uzbekistan; Vanuatu; Vatikanstaten; Venezuela; Vietnam; Wallis og Futuna; Vestsahara; Yemen; Zambia; Zimbabwe; Ålandsøerne; Andet
ja: 国: アフガニスタン; アルバニア; アルジェリア; アンドラ; アンゴラ; アンギラ; アンティグア・バーブーダ; アルゼンチン; アルメニア; アルバ; アセンション島; オーストラリア; オーストリア; アゼルバイジャン; バハマ; バーレーン; バングラデシュ; バルバドス; ベラルーシ; ベルギー; ベリーズ; ベナン; バミューダ; ブータン; ボリビア; ボスニア・ヘルツェゴビナ; ボツワナ; ブラジル; イギリス領インド洋地域; イギリス領バージン諸島; ブルネイ; ブルガリア; ブルキナファソ; ブルンジ; カンボジア; カメルーン; カナダ; カーボベルデ; カリブ海オランダ; ケイマン諸島; 中央アフリカ共和国; チャド; チリ; 中国; クリスマス島; ココス (キーリング) 諸島; コロンビア; コモロ; コンゴ - ブラザヴィル; コンゴ - キンシャサ; クック諸島; コスタリカ; クロアチア; キュラソー; キプロス; チェコ; コートジボワール; デンマーク; ジブチ; ドミニカ; ドミニカ共和国; エクアドル; エジプト; エルサルバドル; 赤道ギニア; エリトリア; エストニア; エスワティニ; エチオピア; フォークランド諸島; フェロー諸島; フィジー; フィンランド; フランス; フランス領ギアナ; フランス領ポリネシア; フランス領南方・南極地域; ガボン; ガンビア; ジョージア; ドイツ; ガーナ; ジブラルタル; ギリシャ; グリーンランド; グレナダ; グアドループ; グアテマラ; ガーンジー; ギニア; ギニアビサウ; ガイアナ; ハイチ; ホンジュラス; 香港特別行政区; ハンガリー; アイスランド; インド; インドネシア; イラク; アイルランド; マン島; イスラエル; イタリア; ジャマイカ; 日本; ジャージー; ヨルダン; カザフスタン; ケニア; キリバス; コソボ; クウェート; キルギス; ラオス; ラトビア; レバノン; レソト; リベリア; リビア; リヒテンシュタイン; リトアニア; ルクセンブルク; マカオ特別行政区; マダガスカル; マラウイ; マレーシア; モルディブ; マリ; マルタ; マルティニーク; モーリタニア; モーリシャス; マヨット; メキシコ; モルドバ; モナコ; モンゴル; モンテネグロ; モントセラト; モロッコ; モザンビーク; ミャンマー (旧ビルマ); ナミビア; ナウル; ネパール; オランダ; ニューカレドニア; ニュージーランド料理; ニカラグア; ニジェール; ナイジェリア; ニウエ; ノーフォーク島; 北マケドニア; ノルウェー; オマーン; パキスタン; パレスチナ領土; パナマ; パプアニューギニア; パラグアイ; ペルー; フィリピン; ピトケアン諸島; ポーランド; ポルトガル; カタール; ルーマニア; ロシア; ルワンダ; レユニオン; サモア; サンマリノ; サウジアラビア; セネガル; セルビア; セーシェル; シエラレオネ; シンガポール; シント・マールテン; スロバキア; スロベニア; ソロモン諸島; ソマリア; 南アフリカ; サウスジョージア島・サウスサンドウィッチ諸島; 韓国; 南スーダン; スペイン; スリランカ; サン・バルテルミー島; セントヘレナ; セントクリストファー・ネービス; セントルシア; セント・マーチン; サンピエール島・ミクロン島; セントビンセントおよびグレナディーン諸島; スーダン; スリナム; スヴァールバル諸島およびヤンマイエン島; スウェーデン; スイス; サントメ・プリンシペ; 台湾; タジキスタン; タンザニア; タイ; 東ティモール; トーゴ; トケラウ; トンガ; トリニダード・トバゴ; トリスタンダクーニャ; チュニジア; トルクメニスタン; タークス・カイコス諸島; ツバル; トルコ; 合衆国領有小離島; ウガンダ; ウクライナ; アラブ首長国連邦; イギリス; アメリカ; ウルグアイ; ウズベキスタン; バヌアツ; バチカン市国; ベネズエラ; ベトナム; ウォリス・フツナ; 西サハラ; イエメン; ザンビア; ジンバブエ; オーランド諸島; その他
zh-TW: 國家/地區: 阿富汗; 阿爾巴尼亞; 阿爾及利亞; 安道爾; 安哥拉; 安奎拉; 安地卡及巴布達; 阿根廷; 亞美尼亞; 阿魯巴; 阿森松島; 澳洲; 奧地利; 亞塞拜然; 巴哈馬; 巴林; 孟加拉; 巴貝多; 白俄羅斯; 比利時; 貝里斯; 貝南; 百慕達; 不丹; 玻利維亞; 波士尼亞與赫塞哥維納; 波札那; 巴西; 英屬印度洋領地; 英屬維京群島; 汶萊; 保加利亞; 布吉納法索; 蒲隆地; 柬埔寨; 喀麥隆; 加拿大; 維德角; 荷蘭加勒比區; 開曼群島; 中非共和國; 查德; 智利; 中國; 聖誕島; 科克斯 (基靈) 群島; 哥倫比亞; 葛摩; 剛果 - 布拉柴維爾; 剛果 - 金夏沙; 庫克群島; 哥斯大黎加; 克羅埃西亞; 庫拉索; 賽普勒斯; 捷克; 象牙海岸; 丹麥; 吉布地; 多明尼加; 多明尼加共和國; 厄瓜多; 埃及; 薩爾瓦多; 赤道幾內亞; 厄利垂亞; 愛沙尼亞; 史瓦帝尼; 衣索比亞; 福克蘭群島; 法羅群島; 斐濟; 芬蘭; 法國; 法屬圭亞那; 法屬玻里尼西亞; 法屬南部屬地; 加彭; 甘比亞; 喬治亞州; 德國; 迦納; 直布羅陀; 希臘; 格陵蘭; 格瑞那達; 瓜地洛普; 瓜地馬拉; 耿西; 幾內亞; 幾內亞比索; 蓋亞那; 海地; 宏都拉斯; 香港特別行政區; 匈牙利; 冰島; 印度; 印尼; 伊拉克; 愛爾蘭; 曼島; 以色列; 義大利; 牙買加; 日本; 澤西島; 約旦; 哈薩克; 肯亞; 吉里巴斯; 科索沃; 科威特; 吉爾吉斯斯坦; 寮國; 拉脫維亞; 黎巴嫩; 賴索托; 賴比瑞亞; 利比亞; 列支敦斯登; 立陶宛; 盧森堡; 澳門特別行政區; 馬達加斯加; 馬拉威; 馬來西亞; 馬爾地夫; 馬裡; 馬爾他; 馬丁尼克; 茅利塔尼亞; 模里西斯; 馬約特島; 墨西哥; 摩爾多瓦; 摩納哥; 蒙古; 蒙特內哥羅; 蒙哲臘; 摩洛哥; 莫三比克; 緬甸; 納米比亞; 諾魯; 尼泊爾; 荷蘭; 新喀里多尼亞; 紐西蘭; 尼加拉瓜; 尼日; 奈及利亞; 紐埃島; 諾福克島; 北馬其頓; 挪威; 阿曼; 巴基斯坦; 巴勒斯坦領土; 巴拿馬; 巴布亞紐幾內亞; 巴拉圭; 秘魯; 菲律賓; 皮特凱恩群島; 波蘭; 葡萄牙; 卡達; 羅馬尼亞; 俄羅斯; 盧安達; 留尼旺島; 薩摩亞; 聖馬利諾; 沙烏地阿拉伯; 塞內加爾; 塞爾維亞; 塞席爾; 獅子山; 新加坡; 荷屬聖馬丁; 斯洛伐克; 斯洛維尼亞; 索羅門群島; 索馬利亞; 南非; 南喬治亞與南三明治群島; 韓國; 南蘇丹; 西班牙; 斯里蘭卡; 聖巴泰勒米島; 聖赫勒拿島; 聖克里斯多福及尼維斯; 聖露西亞; 聖馬丁島; 聖皮埃與密克隆群島; 聖文森及格瑞那丁; 蘇丹; 蘇利南; 斯瓦巴和揚馬延; 瑞典; 瑞士; 聖多美及普林西比; 台灣; 塔吉克; 坦尚尼亞; 泰國; 東帝汶; 多哥; 托克勞群島; 東加; 千里達及托巴哥; 垂斯坦昆哈; 突尼西亞; 土庫曼; 土克斯及開科斯群島; 吐瓦魯; 土耳其; 美國本土外小島嶼; 烏幹達; 烏克蘭; 阿拉伯聯合大公國; 英國; 美國; 烏拉圭; 烏茲別克; 萬那杜; 梵蒂岡城; 委內瑞拉; 越南; 瓦利斯群島和富圖那群島; 西撒哈拉; 葉門; 尚比亞; 辛巴威; 奧蘭群島; 其他
cs: Země: Afghánistán; Albánie; Alžírsko; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antigua a Barbuda; Argentina; Arménie; Aruba; Ostrov Ascension; Austrálie; Rakousko; Ázerbájdžán; Bahamy; Bahrajn; Bangladéš; Barbados; Bělorusko; Belgie; Belize; Benin; Bermuda; Bhútán; Bolívie; Bosna a Hercegovina; Botswana; Brazílie; Britské indickooceánské území; Britské Panenské ostrovy; Brunej; Bulharsko; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Kambodža; Kamerun; Kanada; Kapverdy; Karibské Nizozemsko; Kajmanské ostrovy; Středoafrická republika; Čad; Chile; Čína; Vánoční ostrov; Kokosové (Keelingovy) ostrovy; Kolumbie; Komory; Kongo – Brazzaville; Kongo - Kinshasa; Cookovy ostrovy; Kostarika; Chorvatsko; Curaçao; Kypr; Česko; Pobřeží slonoviny; Dánsko; Džibutsko; Dominika; Dominikánská republika; Ekvádor; Egypt; Salvador; Rovníková Guinea; Eritrea; Estonsko; Svazijsko; Etiopie; Alandské ostrovy; Faerské ostrovy; Fidži; Finsko; Francie; Francouzská Guyana; Francouzská Polynésie; Francouzská jižní území; Gabon; Gambie; Gruzie; Německo; Ghana; Gibraltar; Řecko; Grónsko; Grenada; Guadeloupe; Guatemala; Guernsey; Guinea; Guinea-Bissau; Guyana; Haiti; Honduras; Hong Kong SAR; Maďarsko; Island; Indie; Indonésie; Irák; Irsko; Ostrov Man; Izrael; Itálie; Jamajka; Japonsko; Jersey; Jordánsko; Kazachstán; Keňa; Kiribati; Kosovo; Kuvajt; Kyrgyzstán; Laos; Lotyšsko; Libanon; Lesotho; Libérie; Libye; Lichtenštejnsko; Litva; Lucembursko; Macao SAR; Madagaskar; Malawi; Malajsie; Maledivy; Mali; Malta; Martinique; Mauritánie; Mauricius; Mayotte; Mexiko; Moldavsko; Monako; Mongolsko; Černá Hora; Montserrat; Maroko; Mosambik; Myanmar (Barma); Namibie; Nauru; Nepál; Nizozemsko; Nová Kaledonie; Nový Zéland; Nikaragua; Niger; Nigérie; Niue; Ostrov Norfolk; Severní Makedonie; Norsko; Omán; Pákistán; Palestinská území; Panama; Papua-Nová Guinea; Paraguay; Peru; Filipíny; Pitcairnovy ostrovy; Polsko; Portugalsko; Katar; Rumunsko; Rusko; Rwanda; Réunion; Samoa; San Marino; Saúdská Arábie; Senegal; Srbsko; Seychely; Sierra Leone; Singapur; Svatý Martin; Slovensko; Slovinsko; Šalomounovy ostrovy; Somálsko; Jihoafrická republika; Jižní Georgie a Jižní Sandwichovy ostrovy; Jižní Korea; Jižní Súdán; Španělsko; Srí Lanka; St Barthélemy; Svatá Helena; Svatý Kryštof a Nevis; Svatá Lucie; Svatý Martin; St Pierre a Miquelon; Svatý Vincent a Grenadiny; Súdán; Surinam; Svalbard & Jan Mayen; Švédsko; Švýcarsko; São Tomé & Príncipe; Tchaj-wan; Tádžikistán; Tanzanie; Thajsko; Východní Timor; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad & Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunisko; Turkmenistán; Ostrovy Turks a Caicos; Tuvalu; Turecko; Americké odlehlé ostrovy; Uganda; Ukrajina; Spojené arabské emiráty; Spojené království; Spojené státy americké; Uruguay; Uzbekistán; Vanuatu; Vatikán; Venezuela; Vietnam; Wallis & Futuna; Western Sahara; Jemen; Zambie; Zimbabwe; Alandské ostrovy; Jiné
ru: Страна: Афганистан; Албания; Алжир; Андорра; Ангола; Ангилья; Антигуа и Барбуда; Аргентина; Армения; Аруба; Остров Вознесения; Австралия; Австрия; Азербайджан; Багамы; Бахрейн; Бангладеш; Барбадос; Беларусь; Бельгия; Белиз; Бенин; Бермудские острова; Бутан; Боливия; Босния и Герцеговина; Ботсвана; Бразилия; Британская территория в Индийском океане; Британские Виргинские острова; Бруней; Болгария; Буркина-Фасо; Бурунди; Камбоджа; Камерун; Канада; Кабо-Верде; Карибские Нидерланды; Каймановы острова; Центральноафриканская Республика; Чад; Чили; Китай; Остров Рождества; Кокосовые острова (Килинг); Колумбия; Коморские острова; Конго - Браззавиль; Конго - Киншаса; Острова Кука; Коста-Рика; Хорватия; Кюрасао; Кипр; Чехия; Кот-д'Ивуар; Дания; Джибути; Доминика; Доминиканская Республика; Эквадор; Египет; Сальвадор; Экваториальная Гвинея; Эритрея; Эстония; Эсватини; Эфиопия; Фолклендские острова; Фарерские острова; Фиджи; Финляндия; Франция; Французская Гвиана; Французская Полинезия; Французские Южные Территории; Габон; Гамбия; Грузия; Германия; Гана; Гибралтар; Греция; Гренландия; Гренада; Гваделупа; Гватемала; Гернси; Гвинея; Гвинея-Бисау; Гайана; Гаити; Гондурас; Гонконг, САР; Венгрия; Исландия; Индия; Индонезия; Ирак; Ирландия; Остров Мэн; Израиль; Италия; Ямайка; Япония; Джерси; Иордания; Казахстан; Кения; Кирибати; Косово; Кувейт; Кыргызстан; Лаос; Латвия; Ливан; Лесото; Либерия; Ливия; Лихтенштейн; Литва; Люксембург; Макао, САР; Мадагаскар; Малави; Малайзия; Мальдивы; Мали; Мальта; Мартиника; Мавритания; Маврикий; Майотта; Мексика; Молдова; Монако; Монголия; Черногория; Монтсеррат; Марокко; Мозамбик; Мьянма (Бирма); Намибия; Науру; Непал; Нидерланды; Новая Каледония; Новая Зеландия; Никарагуа; Нигер; Нигерия; Ниуэ; Остров Норфолк; Северная Македония; Норвегия; Оман; Пакистан; Палестинские территории; Панама; Папуа-Новая Гвинея; Парагвай; Перу; Филиппины; Острова Питкэрн; Польша; Португалия; Катар; Румыния; Россия; Руанда; Реюньон; Самоа; Сан-Марино; Саудовская Аравия; Сенегал; Сербия; Сейшельские острова; Сьерра-Леоне; Сингапур; Синт-Мартен; Словакия; Словения; Соломоновы острова; Сомали; Южная Африка; Южная Георгия и Южные Сандвичевы острова; Южная Корея; Южный Судан; Испания; Шри-Ланка; Сен-Бартелеми; Остров Святой Елены; Сент-Китс и Невис; Сент-Люсия; Сен-Мартен; Сен-Пьер и Микелон; Сент-Винсент и Гренадины; Судан; Суринам; Шпицберген и Ян-Майен; Швеция; Швейцария; Сан-Томе и Принсипи; Тайвань; Таджикистан; Танзания; Таиланд; Восточный Тимор; Того; Токелау; Тонга; Тринидад и Тобаго; Тристан-да-Кунья; Тунис; Туркменистан; Острова Теркс и Кайкос; Тувалу; Турция; Внешние малые острова США; Уганда; Украина; Объединенные Арабские Эмираты; Великобритания; Соединенные Штаты; Уругвай; Узбекистан; Вануату; Ватикан; Венесуэла; Вьетнам; Уоллис и Футуна; Западная Сахара; Йемен; Замбия; Зимбабве; Аландские острова; Другое
en: Country: Afghanistan; Albania; Algeria; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antigua & Barbuda; Argentina; Armenia; Aruba; Ascension Island; Australia; Austria; Azerbaijan; Bahamas; Bahrain; Bangladesh; Barbados; Belarus; Belgium; Belize; Benin; Bermuda; Bhutan; Bolivia; Bosnia & Herzegovina; Botswana; Brazil; British Indian Ocean Territory; British Virgin Islands; Brunei; Bulgaria; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Cambodia; Cameroon; Canada; Cape Verde; Caribbean Netherlands; Cayman Islands; Central African Republic; Chad; Chile; China; Christmas Island; Cocos (Keeling) Islands; Colombia; Comoros; Congo - Brazzaville; Congo - Kinshasa; Cook Islands; Costa Rica; Croatia; Curaçao; Cyprus; Czechia; Côte d'Ivoire; Denmark; Djibouti; Dominica; Dominican Republic; Ecuador; Egypt; El Salvador; Equatorial Guinea; Eritrea; Estonia; Eswatini; Ethiopia; Falkland Islands; Faroe Islands; Fiji; Finland; France; French Guiana; French Polynesia; French Southern Territories; Gabon; Gambia; Georgia; Germany; Ghana; Gibraltar; Greece; Greenland; Grenada; Guadeloupe; Guatemala; Guernsey; Guinea; Guinea-Bissau; Guyana; Haiti; Honduras; Hong Kong SAR; Hungary; Iceland; India; Indonesia; Iraq; Ireland; Isle of Man; Israel; Italy; Jamaica; Japan; Jersey; Jordan; Kazakhstan; Kenya; Kiribati; Kosovo; Kuwait; Kyrgyzstan; Laos; Latvia; Lebanon; Lesotho; Liberia; Libya; Liechtenstein; Lithuania; Luxembourg; Macao SAR; Madagascar; Malawi; Malaysia; Maldives; Mali; Malta; Martinique; Mauritania; Mauritius; Mayotte; Mexico; Moldova; Monaco; Mongolia; Montenegro; Montserrat; Morocco; Mozambique; Myanmar (Burma); Namibia; Nauru; Nepal; Netherlands; New Caledonia; New Zealand; Nicaragua; Niger; Nigeria; Niue; Norfolk Island; North Macedonia; Norway; Oman; Pakistan; Palestinian Territories; Panama; Papua New Guinea; Paraguay; Peru; Philippines; Pitcairn Islands; Poland; Portugal; Qatar; Romania; Russia; Rwanda; Réunion; Samoa; San Marino; Saudi Arabia; Senegal; Serbia; Seychelles; Sierra Leone; Singapore; Sint Maarten; Slovakia; Slovenia; Solomon Islands; Somalia; South Africa; South Georgia & South Sandwich Islands; South Korea; South Sudan; Spain; Sri Lanka; St Barthélemy; St Helena; St Kitts & Nevis; St Lucia; St Martin; St Pierre & Miquelon; St Vincent & the Grenadines; Sudan; Suriname; Svalbard & Jan Mayen; Sweden; Switzerland; São Tomé & Príncipe; Taiwan; Tajikistan; Tanzania; Thailand; Timor-Leste; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad & Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunisia; Turkmenistan; Turks & Caicos Islands; Tuvalu; Türkiye; US Outlying Islands; Uganda; Ukraine; United Arab Emirates; United Kingdom; United States; Uruguay; Uzbekistan; Vanuatu; Vatican City; Venezuela; Vietnam; Wallis & Futuna; Western Sahara; Yemen; Zambia; Zimbabwe; Åland Islands; Other
sl-SI: Država: Afganistan; Albanija; Alžirija; Andora; Angola; Angvila; Antigva in Barbuda; Argentina; Armenija; Aruba; Otok Ascension; Avstralija; Avstrija; Azerbajdžan; Bahami; Bahrajn; Bangladeš; Barbados; Belorusija; Belgija; Belize; Benin; Bermuda; Butan; Bolivija; Bosna in Hercegovina; Bocvana; Brazilija; Britansko ozemlje Indijskega oceana; Britanski Deviški otoki; Brunej; Bolgarija; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Kambodža; Kamerun; Kanada; Zelenortski otoki; Karibska Nizozemska; Kajmanski otoki; Srednjeafriška republika; Čad; Čile; Kitajska; Božični otok; Kokosovi (Keelingovi) otoki; Kolumbija; Komori; Kongo - Brazzaville; Kongo - Kinšasa; Cookovi otoki; Kostarika; Hrvaška; Curaçao; Ciper; Češka; Slonokoščena obala; Danska; Džibuti; Dominika; Dominikanska republika; Ekvador; Egipt; El Salvador; Ekvatorialna Gvineja; Eritreja; Estonija; Eswatini; Etiopija; Falklandski otoki; Ferski otoki; Fidži; Finska; Francija; Francoska Gvajana; Francoska Polinezija; Francoska južna ozemlja; Gabon; Gambija; Gruzija; Nemčija; Gana; Gibraltar; Grčija; Grenlandija; Grenada; Guadeloupe; Gvatemala; Guernsey; Gvineja; Gvineja Bissau; Gvajana; Haiti; Honduras; Hong Kong SAR; Madžarska; Islandija; Indija; Indonezija; Irak; Irska; Otok Man; Izrael; Italija; Jamajka; Japonska; Jersey; Jordanija; Kazahstan; Kenija; Kiribati; Kosovo; Kuvajt; Kirgizistan; Laos; Latvija; Libanon; Lesoto; Liberija; Libija; Lihtenštajn; Litva; Luksemburg; Macao SAR; Madagaskar; Malavi; Malezija; Maldivi; Mali; Malta; Martinik; Mavretanija; Mavricij; Mayotte; Mehika; Moldavija; Monako; Mongolija; Črna gora; Montserrat; Maroko; Mozambik; Mjanmar (Burma); Namibija; Nauru; Nepal; Nizozemska; Nova Kaledonija; Nova Zelandija; Nikaragva; Niger; Nigerija; Niue; Otok Norfolk; Severna Makedonija; Norveška; Oman; Pakistan; Palestinska ozemlja; Panama; Papua Nova Gvineja; Paragvaj; Peru; Filipini; Otoki Pitcairn; Poljska; Portugalska; Katar; Romunija; Rusija; Ruanda; Reunion; Samoa; San Marino; Savdska Arabija; Senegal; Srbija; Sejšeli; Sierra Leone; Singapur; Nizozemski Sveti Martin; Slovaška; Slovenija; Salomonovi otoki; Somalija; Južna Afrika; Južna Georgija in Južni Sandwichevi otoki; Južna Koreja; Južni Sudan; Španija; Šrilanka; Sveti Bartolomej; Sveta Helena; Sveti Krištof in Nevis; Sveta Lucija; Sveti Martin; Sveta Peter in Mihael; Sveti Vincencij in Grenadine; Sudan; Surinam; Svalbard in Jan Mayen; Švedska; Švica; Sveti Tomaž in Princ; Tajvan; Tadžikistan; Tanzanija; Tajska; Timor-Leste; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad in Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunizija; Turkmenistan; Otoki Turks in Caicos; Tuvalu; Turčija; Obrobni otoki ZDA; Uganda; Ukrajina; Združeni arabski emirati; Združeno kraljestvo; Združene države Amerike; Urugvaj; Uzbekistan; Vanuatu; Vatikan; Venezuela; Vietnam; Wallis in Futuna; Zahodna Sahara; Jemen; Zambija; Zimbabve; Ålandski otoki; Drugo
pl: Kraj: Afganistan; Albania; Algieria; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antigua i Barbuda; Argentyna; Armenia; Aruba; Wyspa Wniebowstąpienia; Australia; Austria; Azerbejdżan; Bahamy; Bahrajn; Bangladesz; Barbados; Białoruś; Belgia; Belize; Benin; Bermudy; Bhutan; Boliwia; Bośnia i Hercegowina; Botswana; Brazylia; Brytyjskie Terytorium Oceanu Indyjskiego; Brytyjskie Wyspy Dziewicze; Brunei; Bułgaria; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Kambodża; Kamerun; Kanada; Republika Zielonego Przylądka; Holandia Karaibska; Kajmany; Republika Środkowoafrykańska; Czad; Chile; Chiny; Wyspa Bożego Narodzenia; Wyspy Kokosowe (Keelinga).; Kolumbia; Komory; Kongo – Brazzaville; Kongo – Kinszasa; Wyspy Cooka; Kostaryka; Chorwacja; Curaçao; Cypr; Czechy; Wybrzeże Kości Słoniowej; Dania; Dżibuti; Dominica; Republika Dominikany; Ekwador; Egipt; Salwador; Gwinea Równikowa; Erytrea; Estonia; Eswatini; Etiopia; Falklandy; Wyspy Owcze; Fidżi; Finlandia; Francja; Gujana Francuska; Polinezja Francuska; Francuskie Terytoria Południowe; Gabon; Gambia; Gruzja; Niemcy; Ghana; Gibraltar; Grecja; Grenlandia; Grenada; Gwadelupa; Gwatemala; Guernsey; Gwinea; Guinea-Bissau; Gujana; Haiti; Honduras; Specjalny Region Administracyjny Hongkong; Węgry; Islandia; Indie; Indonezja; Irak; Irlandia; Wyspa Man; Izrael; Włochy; Jamajka; Japonia; Jersey; Jordania; Kazachstan; Kenia; Kiribati; Kosowo; Kuwejt; Kirgistan; Laos; Łotwa; Liban; Lesoto; Liberia; Libia; Liechtenstein; Litwa; Luksemburg; Specjalny Region Administracyjny Makau; Madagaskar; Malawi; Malezja; Malediwy; Mali; Malta; Martynika; Mauretania; Mauritius; Majotta; Meksyk; Mołdawia; Monako; Mongolia; Czarnogóra; Montserrat; Maroko; Mozambik; Mjanma (Birma); Namibia; Nauru; Nepal; Holandia; Nowa Kaledonia; nowozelandzka; Nikaragua; Niger; Nigeria; Niue; Wyspa Norfolk; Macedonia Północna; Norwegia; Oman; Pakistan; Terytoria Palestyńskie; Panama; Papua Nowa Gwinea; Paragwaj; Peru; Filipiny; Wyspy Pitcairn; Polska; Portugalia; Katar; Rumunia; Rosja; Rwanda; Reunion; Samoa; San Marino; Arabia Saudyjska; Senegal; Serbia; Seszele; Sierra Leone; Singapur; Sint Maarten; Słowacja; Słowenia; Wyspy Salomona; Somalia; Afryka Południowa; Georgia Południowa i Sandwich Południowy; Korea Południowa; Sudan Południowy; Hiszpania; Sri Lanka; Saint-Barthélemy; Wyspa Świętej Heleny; Saint Kitts i Nevis; Saint Lucia; Saint Martin; Saint-Pierre i Miquelon; Saint Vincent i Grenadyny; Sudan; Surinam; Svalbard i Jan Mayen; Szwecja; Szwajcaria; Wyspy Świętego Tomasza i Książęca; Tajwan; Tadżykistan; Tanzania; Tajlandia; Timor Wschodni; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trynidad i Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunezja; Turkmenistan; Turks i Caicos; Tuvalu; Turcja; Dalekie Wyspy Mniejsze Stanów Zjednoczonych; Uganda; Ukraina; Zjednoczone Emiraty Arabskie; Wielka Brytania; Stany Zjednoczone; Urugwaj; Uzbekistan; Vanuatu; Watykan; Wenezuela; Wietnam; Wallis i Futuna; Sahara Zachodnia; Jemen; Zambia; Zimbabwe; Wyspy Alandzkie; Inne
hu: Ország: Afganisztán; Albánia; Algéria; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antigua és Barbuda; Argentína; Örményország; Aruba; Ascension-sziget; Ausztrália; Ausztria; Azerbajdzsán; Bahama-szigetek; Bahrein; Banglades; Barbados; Fehéroroszország; Belgium; Belize; Benin; Bermuda; Bhután; Bolívia; Bosznia-Hercegovina; Botswana; Brazília; Brit indiai-óceáni terület; Brit Virgin-szigetek; Brunei; Bulgária; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Kambodzsa; Kamerun; Kanada; Zöld-foki-szigetek; Karibi Hollandia; Kajmán-szigetek; Közép-afrikai Köztársaság; Csád; Chile; Kína; Karácsony-sziget; Kókusz (Keeling)-szigetek; Kolumbia; Comore-szigetek; Kongó – Brazzaville; Kongó – Kinshasa; Cook-szigetek; Costa Rica; Horvátország; Curaçao; Ciprus; Csehország; Elefántcsontpart; Dánia; Dzsibuti; Dominika; Dominikai Köztársaság; Ecuador; Egyiptom; El Salvador; Egyenlítői-Guinea; Eritrea; Észtország; eSwatini; Etiópia; Falkland-szigetek; Feröer-szigetek; Fidzsi-szigetek; Finnország; Franciaország; Francia Guyana; Francia Polinézia; Francia déli és antarktiszi területek; Gabon; Gambia; Grúzia; Németország; Ghána; Gibraltár; Görögország; Grönland; Grenada; Guadeloupe; Guatemala; Guernsey; Guinea; Guinea-Bissau; Guyana; Haiti; Honduras; Hongkong KKT; Magyarország; Izland; India; Indonézia; Irak; Írország; Man-sziget; Izrael; Olaszország; Jamaica; Japán; Jersey; Jordánia; Kazahsztán; Kenya; Kiribati; Koszovó; Kuvait; Kirgizisztán; Laosz; Lettország; Libanon; Lesotho; Libéria; Líbia; Liechtenstein; Litvánia; Luxemburg; Makaó KKT; Madagaszkár; Malawi; Malajzia; Maldív-szigetek; Mali; Málta; Martinique; Mauritánia; Mauritius; Mayotte; Mexikó; Moldova; Monaco; Mongólia; Montenegró; Montserrat; Marokkó; Mozambik; Mianmar (Burma); Namíbia; Nauru; Nepál; Hollandia; Új-Kaledónia; Új-Zéland; Nicaragua; Niger; Nigéria; Niue; Norfolk-sziget; Észak-Macedónia; Norvégia; Omán; Pakisztán; Palesztin területek; Panama; Pápua Új-Guinea; Paraguay; Peru; Fülöp-szigetek; Pitcairn-szigetek; Lengyelország; Portugália; Katar; Románia; Oroszország; Ruanda; Réunion; Szamoa; San Marino; Szaúd-Arábia; Szenegál; Szerbia; Seychelle-szigetek; Sierra Leone; Szingapúr; Sint Maarten; Szlovákia; Szlovénia; Salamon-szigetek; Szomália; Dél-Afrika; Déli-Georgia és Déli Sandwich-szigetek; Dél-Korea; Dél-Szudán; Spanyolország; Sri Lanka; Saint-Barthélemy; Szent Ilona; Saint Kitts és Nevis; Saint Lucia; Szent Márton-sziget; Saint-Pierre és Miquelon; Saint Vincent és a Grenadine-szigetek; Szudán; Suriname; Spitzbergák (Svalbard) és Jan Mayen-sziget; Svédország; Svájc; São Tomé és Príncipe; Tajvan; Tádzsikisztán; Tanzánia; Thaiföld; Kelet-Timor; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad és Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunézia; Türkmenisztán; Turks- és Caicos-szigetek; Tuvalu; Törökország; Az Amerikai Egyesült Államok lakatlan külbirtokai; Uganda; Ukrajna; Egyesült Arab Emírségek; Egyesült Királyság; Amerikai Egyesült Államok; Uruguay; Üzbegisztán; Vanuatu; Vatikánváros; Venezuela; Vietnám; Wallis és Futuna; Nyugat-Szahara; Jemen; Zambia; Zimbabwe; Åland-szigetek; Egyéb
de: Land: Afghanistan; Albanien; Algerien; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antigua und Barbuda; Argentinien; Armenien; Aruba; Ascension; Australien; Österreich; Aserbaidschan; Bahamas; Bahrain; Bangladesch; Barbados; Belarus; Belgien; Belize; Benin; Bermuda; Bhutan; Bolivien; Bosnien und Herzegowina; Botswana; Brasilien; Britisches Territorium im Indischen Ozean; Britische Jungferninseln; Brunei; Bulgarien; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Kambodscha; Kamerun; Kanada; Kap Verde; Karibische Niederlande; Caymaninseln; Zentralafrikanische Republik; Tschad; Chile; China; Weihnachtsinsel; Kokosinseln (Keeling-Inseln); Kolumbien; Komoren; Republik Kongo; Demokratische Republik Kongo; Cookinseln; Costa Rica; Kroatien; Curaçao; Zypern; Tschechien; Elfenbeinküste; Dänemark; Dschibuti; Dominica; Dominikanische Republik; Ecuador; Ägypten; El Salvador; Äquatorialguinea; Eritrea; Estland; Eswatini; Äthiopien; Falklandinseln; Färöer; Fidschi; Finnland; Frankreich; Französisch-Guayana; Französisch-Polynesien; Französische Südpolarterritorien; Gabun; Gambia; Georgien; Deutschland; Ghana; Gibraltar; Griechenland; Grönland; Grenada; Guadeloupe; Guatemala; Guernsey; Guinea; Guinea-Bissau; Guyana; Haiti; Honduras; Hongkong; Ungarn; Island; Indien; Indonesien; Irak; Irland; Isle of Man; Israel; Italien; Jamaika; Japan; Jersey; Jordanien; Kasachstan; Kenia; Kiribati; Kosovo; Kuwait; Kirgisistan; Laos; Lettland; Libanon; Lesotho; Liberia; Libyen; Liechtenstein; Litauen; Luxemburg; Macao; Madagaskar; Malawi; Malaysia; Malediven; Mali; Malta; Martinique; Mauretanien; Mauritius; Mayotte; Mexiko; Moldau; Monaco; Mongolei; Montenegro; Montserrat; Marokko; Mosambik; Myanmar; Namibia; Nauru; Nepal; Niederlande; Neukaledonien; Neuseeland; Nicaragua; Niger; Nigeria; Niue; Norfolkinsel; Nordmazedonien; Norwegen; Oman; Pakistan; Palästinensische Autonomiegebiete; Panama; Papua-Neuguinea; Paraguay; Peru; Philippinen; Pitcairninseln; Polen; Portugal; Katar; Rumänien; Russland; Ruanda; Réunion; Samoa; San Marino; Saudi-Arabien; Senegal; Serbien; Seychellen; Sierra Leone; Singapur; Sint Maarten; Slowakei; Slowenien; Salomonen; Somalia; Südafrika; Südgeorgien und die Südlichen Sandwichinseln; Südkorea; Südsudan; Spanien; Sri Lanka; Saint-Barthélemy; St. Helena; St. Kitts und Nevis; St. Lucia; St. Martin; St. Pierre und Miquelon; St. Vincent und die Grenadinen; Sudan; Surinam; Spitzbergen und Jan Mayen; Schweden; Schweiz; São Tomé und Príncipe; Taiwan; Tadschikistan; Tansania; Thailand; Osttimor; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad und Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunesien; Turkmenistan; Turks- und Caicosinseln; Tuvalu; Türkei; US Minor Outlying Islands; Uganda; Ukraine; Vereinigte Arabische Emirate; Großbritannien; Vereinigte Staaten; Uruguay; Usbekistan; Vanuatu; Vatikanstadt; Venezuela; Vietnam; Wallis und Futuna; Westsahara; Jemen; Sambia; Zimbabwe; Åland-Inseln; Sonstiges
vi: Quốc gia: Afghanistan; Albania; Algeria; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antigua & Barbuda; Argentina; Armenia; Aruba; Đảo Ascension; Châu Úc; Áo; Azerbaijan; Bahamas; Bahrain; Bangladesh; Barbados; Belarus; Bỉ; Belize; Benin; Bermuda; Bhutan; Bolivia; Bosnia & Herzegovina; Botswana; Brazil; Lãnh thổ Ấn Độ Dương thuộc Anh; Quần đảo British Virgin; Brunei; Bulgaria; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Campuchia; Cameroon; Canada; Cape Verde; Caribe thuộc Hà Lan; Quần đảo Cayman; Cộng hòa Trung Phi; Chad; Chile; Trung Quốc; Đảo Giáng Sinh; Quần đảo Cocos (Keeling); Colombia; Comoros; Congo-Brazzaville; Congo - Kinshasa; Quần đảo Cook; Costa Rica; Croatia; Curaçao; Síp; Séc; Bờ biển Ngà; Đan Mạch; Djibouti; Dominica; Cộng hòa Dominica; Ecuador; Ai Cập; El Salvador; Guinea Xích đạo; Eritrea; Estonia; Eswatini; Ethiopia; Quần đảo Falkland; Quần đảo Faroe; Fiji; Phần Lan; Pháp; Guiana thuộc Pháp; Polynesia thuộc Pháp; Lãnh thổ phía Nam của Pháp; Gabon; Gambia; Georgia; Đức; Ghana; Gibraltar; Hy Lạp; Greenland; Grenada; Guadeloupe; Guatemala; Guernsey; Guinea; Guinea-Bissau; Guyana; Haiti; Honduras; Đặc khu hành chính Hồng Kông; Hungary; Iceland; Ấn Độ; Indonesia; Iraq; Ireland; Đảo Man; Israel; Ý; Jamaica; Nhật Bản; Jersey; Jordan; Kazakhstan; Kenya; Kiribati; Kosovo; Kuwait; Kyrgyzstan; Lào; Latvia; Li-băng; Lesotho; Liberia; Libya; Liechtenstein; Lít-va; Luxembourg; Đặc khu hành chính Macao; Madagascar; Malawi; Malaysia; Maldives; Mali; Malta; Martinique; Mauritania; Mauritius; Mayotte; Mexico; Moldova; Monaco; Mông Cổ; Montenegro; Montserrat; Ma-rốc; Mozambique; Myanmar (Miến Điện); Namibia; Nauru; Nepal; Hà Lan; New Caledonia; Kiểu New Zealand; Nicaragua; Niger; Nigeria; Niue; Đảo Norfolk; Bắc Macedonia; Na Uy; Oman; Pakistan; Lãnh thổ Palestine; Panama; Papua New Guinea; Paraguay; Peru; Philippines; Quần đảo Pitcairn; Ba Lan; Bồ Đào Nha; Qatar; Romania; Nga; Rwanda; Réunion; Samoa; San Marino; Ả Rập Xê-út; Senegal; Serbia; Seychelles; Sierra Leone; Singapore; Sint Maarten; Slovakia; Slovenia; Quần đảo Solomon; Somalia; Nam Phi; Quần đảo Nam Georgia và Nam Sandwich; Hàn Quốc; Nam Sudan; Tây Ban Nha; Sri Lanka; St Barthélemy; St Helena; St Kitts & Nevis; St Lucia; St Martin; St Pierre & Miquelon; St Vincent & the Grenadines; Sudan; Suriname; Svalbard & Jan Mayen; Thụy Điển; Thụy Sĩ; São Tomé & Príncipe; Đài Loan; Tajikistan; Tanzania; Thái Lan; Timor-Leste; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad & Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunisia; Turkmenistan; Quần đảo Turks & Caicos; Tuvalu; Thổ Nhĩ Kỳ; Các tiểu đảo xa của Hoa Kỳ; Uganda; Ukraine; Các Tiểu Vương quốc Ả Rập Thống nhất; Vương quốc Anh; Hoa Kỳ; Uruguay; Uzbekistan; Vanuatu; Vatican City; Venezuela; Việt Nam; Wallis & Futuna; Tây Sahara; Yemen; Zambia; Zimbabwe; Quần đảo Aland; Khác
fi: Country: Afganistan; Albania; Algeria; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antigua ja Barbuda; Argentiina; Armenia; Aruba; Ascension; Australia; Itävalta; Azerbaidžan; Bahama; Bahrain; Bangladesh; Barbados; Valko-Venäjä; Belgia; Belize; Benin; Bermuda; Bhutan; Bolivia; Bosnia ja Hertsegovina; Botswana; Brasilia; Brittiläinen Intian valtameren alue; Brittiläiset Neitsytsaaret; Brunei; Bulgaria; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Kambodža; Kamerun; Kanada; Kap Verde; Alankomaiden Karibia; Caymansaaret; Keski-Afrikan tasavalta; Tšad; Chile; Kiina; Joulusaari; Kookossaaret (Keelingsaaret); Kolumbia; Komorit; Kongo - Brazzaville; Kongo - Kinshasa; Cookinsaaret; Costa Rica; Kroatia; Curaçao; Kypros; Tšekki; Norsunluurannikko; Tanska; Djibouti; Dominica; Dominikaaninen tasavalta; Ecuador; Egypti; El Salvador; Päiväntasaajan Guinea; Eritrea; Viro; Eswatini; Etiopia; Falklandinsaaret; Färsaaret; Fidži; Suomi; Ranska; Ranskan Guayana; Ranskan Polynesia; Ranskan eteläiset alueet; Gabon; Gambia; Georgia; Saksa; Ghana; Gibraltar; Kreikka; Grönlanti; Grenada; Guadeloupe; Guatemala; Guernsey; Guinea; Guinea-Bissau; Guyana; Haiti; Honduras; Hongkongin erityishallintoalue; Unkari; Islanti; Intia; Indonesia; Irak; Irlanti; Mansaari; Israel; Italia; Jamaika; Japani; Jersey; Jordania; Kazakstan; Kenia; Kiribati; Kosovo; Kuwait; Kirgisia; Laos; Latvia; Libanon; Lesotho; Liberia; Libya; Liechtenstein; Liettua; Luxemburg; Macaon erityishallintoalue; Madagascar; Malawi; Malesia; Malediivit; Mali; Malta; Martinique; Mauritania; Mauritius; Mayotte; Meksiko; Moldova; Monaco; Mongolia; Montenegro; Montserrat; Marokko; Mosambik; Myanmar (Burma); Namibia; Nauru; Nepal; Alankomaat; Uusi-Kaledonia; Uusiseelantilainen; Nicaragua; Niger; Nigeria; Niue; Norfolkinsaari; Pohjois-Makedonia; Norja; Oman; Pakistan; Palestiinalaisalue; Panama; Papua-Uusi-Guinea; Paraguay; Peru; Filippiinit; Pitcairnin; Puola; Portugali; Qatar; Romania; Venäjä; Ruanda; Réunion; Samoa; San Marino; Saudi-Arabia; Senegal; Serbia; Seychellit; Sierra Leone; Singapore; Sint Maarten; Slovakia; Slovenia; Solomonsaaret; Somalia; Etelä-Afrikka; Etelä-Georgia ja Eteläiset Sandwichinsaaret; Etelä-Korea; Etelä-Sudan; Espanja; Sri Lanka; Saint-Barthélemy; Saint Helena; Saint Kitts ja Nevis; Saint Lucia; Saint-Martin; Saint-Pierre ja Miquelon; Saint Vincent ja Grenadiinit; Sudan; Suriname; Svalbard ja Jan Mayen; Ruotsi; Sveitsi; São Tomé ja Príncipe; Taiwan; Tadžikistan; Tansania; Thaimaa; Itä-Timor; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad ja Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunisia; Turkmenistan; Turks- ja Caicossaaret; Tuvalu; Turkki; Yhdysvaltain pienet erillissaaret; Uganda; Ukraina; Yhdistyneet Arabiemiirikunnat; Yhdistynyt kuningaskunta; Yhdysvallat; Uruguay; Uzbekistan; Vanuatu; Vatikaanivaltio; Venezuela; Vietnam; Wallis ja Futuna; Länsi-Sahara; Jemen; Zambia; Zimbabwe; Ahvenanmaa; Muu
fr: Pays: Afghanistan; Albanie; Algérie; Andorre; Angola; Anguilla; Antigua-et-Barbuda; Argentine; Arménie; Aruba; Île de l’Ascension; Australie; Autriche; Azerbaïdjan; Bahamas; Bahrain; Bangladesh; Barbados; Biélorussie; Belgique; Bélize; Bénin; Bermudes; Bhutan; Bolivie; Bosnie-Herzégovine; Botswana; Brésil; Territoire britannique de l’océan Indien; Îles Vierges britanniques; Brunei; Bulgarie; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Cambodge; Cameroun; Canada; Cap-Vert; Antilles néerlandaises; Îles Caïmans; République centrafricaine; Tchad; Chili; Chine; Île Christmas; Îles Cocos (Keeling); Colombie; Comores; Congo-Brazzaville; Congo-Kinshasa; Îles Cook; Costa Rica; Croatie; Curaçao; Chypre; Tchéquie; Côte d’Ivoire; Danemark; Djibouti; Dominique; République dominicaine; Équateur; Egypte; Le Salvador; Guinée équatoriale; Érythrée; Estonie; Eswatini; Ethiopie; Îles Malouines; Îles Féroé; Fiji; Finlande; France; Guyane française; Polynésie française; Terres australes françaises; Gabon; Gambie; Géorgie; Allemagne; Ghana; Gibraltar; Grèce; Groenland; Grenada; Guadeloupe; Guatemala; Guernesey; Guinée; Guinea-Bissau; Guyane; Haïti; Honduras; RAS de Hong Kong; Hongrie; Islande; Inde; Indonésie; Iraq; Irlande; île de Man; Israël; Italie; Jamaïque; Japon; Jersey; Jordanie; Kazakhstan; Kenya; Kiribati; Kosovo; Kuwait; Kyrgyzstan; Laos; Lettonie; Liban; Lesotho; Libéria; Libye; Liechtenstein; Lituanie; Luxembourg; RAS de Macao; Madagascar; Malawi; Malaysia; Maldives; Mali; Malta; Martinique; Mauritanie; Ile Maurice; Mayotte; Mexique; Moldavie; Monaco; Mongolie; Monténégro; Montserrat; Maroc; Mozambique; Myanmar (Birmanie); Namibie; Nauru; Népal; Pays-Bas; Nouvelle-Calédonie; Nouvelle-Zélande; Nicaragua; Niger; Nigeria; Nioué; Île Norfolk; Macédoine du Nord; Norvège; Oman; Pakistan; Territoires palestiniens; Panama; Papouasie Nouvelle Guinée; Paraguay; Pérou; Philippines; Îles Pitcairn; Pologne; Portugal; Qatar; Roumanie; Russie; Rwanda; Réunion; Samoa; Saint Marin; Arabie Saoudite; Sénégal; Serbie; Seychelles; Sierra Leone; Singapour; Sint Maarten; Slovaquie; Slovénie; Iles Salomon; Somalie; Afrique du Sud; Géorgie du Sud-et-les îles Sandwich du Sud; Corée du Sud; Soudan du sud; Espagne; Sri Lanka; Saint-Barthélemy; Sainte-Hélène; Saint-Kitts-et-Nevis; Sainte-Lucie; Saint-Martin; Saint-Pierre-et-Miquelon; Saint-Vincent-et-les-Grenadines; Soudan; Surinam; Svalbard et Jan Mayen; Suède; Suisse; Sao Tomé-et-Principe; Taïwan; Tajikistan; Tanzanie; Thaïlande; Timor-Leste; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinité-et-Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunisie; Turkménistan; Îles Turques-et-Caïques; Tuvalu; Turquie; Îles mineures éloignées des États-Unis; Uganda; Ukraine; Emirats Arabes Unis; Royaume-Uni; États-Unis; Uruguay; Uzbekistan; Vanuatu; Cité du Vatican; Venezuela; Vietnam; Wallis-et-Futuna; Sahara occidental; Yémen; Zambie; Zimbabwe; Îles Åland; Autre
it: Country: Afghanistan; Albania; Algeria; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antigua e Barbuda; Argentina; Armenia; Aruba; Isola di Ascensione; Australia; Austria; Azerbaijan; Bahamas; Bahrain; Bangladesh; Barbados; Bielorussia; Belgio; Belize; Benin; Bermuda; Bhutan; Bolivia; Bosnia ed Erzegovina; Botswana; Brasile; Territorio britannico dell'Oceano Indiano; Isole Vergini Britanniche; Brunei; Bulgaria; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Cambogia; Camerun; Canada; Capo Verde; Paesi Bassi caraibici; Isole Cayman; Repubblica Centrafricana; Chad; Cile; Cina; Isola di Natale; Isole Cocos (Keeling); Colombia; Comore; Congo - Brazzaville; Congo - Kinshasa; Isole Cook; Costa Rica; Croazia; Curaçao; Cipro; Cechia; Costa d'Avorio; Danimarca; Gibuti; Dominica; Repubblica Dominicana; Ecuador; Egitto; El Salvador; Guinea Equatoriale; Eritrea; Estonia; Eswatini; Etiopia; Isole Falkland; Isole Faroe; Figi; Finlandia; Francia; Guiana francese; Polinesia francese; Territori australi francesi; Gabon; Gambia; Georgia; Germania; Ghana; Gibilterra; Grecia; Groenlandia; Grenada; Guadalupa; Guatemala; Guernsey; Guinea; Guinea-Bissau; Guyana; Haiti; Honduras; Hong Kong; Ungheria; Islanda; India; Indonesia; Iraq; Irlanda; Isola di Man; Israele; Italia; Giamaica; Giappone; Jersey; Giordania; Kazakistan; Kenia; Kiribati; Kosovo; Kuwait; Kirghizistan; Laos; Lettonia; Libano; Lesoto; Liberia; Libia; Liechtenstein; Lituania; Lussemburgo; Macao; Madagascar; Malawi; Malaysia; Maldive; Mali; Malta; Martinica; Mauritania; Mauritius; Mayotte; Messico; Moldavia; Monaco; Mongolia; Montenegro; Montserrat; Marocco; Mozambico; Myanmar (Birmania); Namibia; Nauru; Nepal; Olanda; Nuova Caledonia; Nuova Zelanda; Nicaragua; Niger; Nigeria; Niue; Isola di Norfolk; Macedonia del Nord; Norvegia; Oman; Pakistan; Territori palestinesi; Panama; Papua Nuova Guinea; Paraguay; Perù; Filippine; Isole Pitcairn; Polonia; Portogallo; Qatar; Romania; Russia; Ruanda; Réunion; Samoa; San Marino; Arabia Saudita; Senegal; Serbia; Seychelles; Sierra Leone; Singapore; Sint Maarten; Slovacchia; Slovenia; Isole Salomone; Somalia; Sud Africa; Georgia del Sud e Sandwich Australi; Corea del Sud; Sudan del Sud; Spagna; Sri Lanka; Saint-Barthélemy; Sant'Elena; Saint Kitts e Nevis; Santa Lucia; Saint Martin; Saint-Pierre e Miquelon; Saint Vincent e Grenadine; Sudan; Suriname; Svalbard e Jan Mayen; Svezia; Svizzera; São Tomé e Príncipe; Taiwan; Tagikistan; Tanzania; Tailandia; Timor Est; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad e Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunisia; Turkmenistan; Isole Turks e Caicos; Tuvalu; Turchia; Isole minori esterne degli Stati Uniti d'America; Uganda; Ucraina; Emirati Arabi Uniti; Regno Unito; Stati Uniti; Uruguay; Uzbekistan; Vanuatu; Città del Vaticano; Venezuela; Vietnam; Wallis e Futuna; Sahara occidentale; Yemen; Zambia; Zimbabwe; Isole Åland; Altro
bg-BG: Държава: Афганистан; Албания; Алжир; Андора; Ангола; Ангила; Антигуа и Барбуда; Аржентина; Армения; Аруба; Остров Възнесение; Австралия; Австрия; Азербайджан; Бахамски острови; Бахрейн; Бангладеш; Барбадос; Беларус; Белгия; Белиз; Бенин; Бермудски острови; Бутан; Боливия; Босна и Херцеговина; Ботсвана; Бразилия; Британска територия в Индийския океан; Британски Вирджински острови; Бруней; България; Буркина Фасо; Бурунди; Камбоджа; Камерун; Канада; Кабо Верде; Нидерландски Антили; Кайманови острови; Централноафриканска република; Чад; Чили; Китай; Остров Рождество; Кокосови острови (Килинг); Колумбия; Коморски острови; Конго - Бразавил; Конго - Киншаса; Острови Кук; Коста Рика; Хърватия; Кюрасао; Кипър; Чехия; Кот д'Ивоар; Дания; Джибути; Доминика; Доминиканска република; Еквадор; Египет; Ел Салвадор; Екваториална Гвинея; Еритрея; Естония; Есватини; Етиопия; Фолклендски острови; Фарьорски острови; Фиджи; Финландия; Франция; Френска Гвиана; Френска Полинезия; Френски южни територии; Габон; Гамбия; Грузия; Германия; Гана; Гибралтар; Гърция; Гренландия; Гренада; Гваделупа; Гватемала; Гърнзи; Гвинея; Гвинея-Бисау; Гвиана; Хаити; Хондурас; САР Хонконг; Унгария; Исландия; Индия; Индонезия; Ирак; Ирландия; Остров Ман; Израел; Италия; Ямайка; Япония; Джърси; Йордания; Казахстан; Кения; Кирибати; Косово; Кувейт; Киргизстан; Лаос; Латвия; Ливан; Лесото; Либерия; Либия; Лихтенщайн; Литва; Люксембург; САР Макао; Мадагаскар; Малави; Малайзия; Малдиви; Мали; Малта; Мартиника; Мавритания; Мавриций; Майот; Мексико; Молдова; Монако; Монголия; Черна гора; Монсерат; Мароко; Мозамбик; Мианмар (Бирма); Намибия; Науру; Непал; Нидерландия; Нова Каледония; Нова Зеландия; Никарагуа; Нигер; Нигерия; Ниуе; Остров Норфолк; Северна Македония; Норвегия; Оман; Пакистан; Палестински територии; Панама; Папуа Нова Гвинея; Парагвай; Перу; Филипини; Острови Питкерн; Полша; Португалия; Катар; Румъния; Русия; Руанда; Реюнион; Самоа; Сан Марино; Саудитска Арабия; Сенегал; Сърбия; Сейшели; Сиера Леоне; Сингапур; Синт Маартен; Словакия; Словения; Соломонови острови; Сомалия; Южна Африка; Южна Джорджия и Южни Сандвичеви острови; Южна Корея; Южен Судан; Испания; Шри Ланка; Сен Бартелми; Света Елена; Сейнт Китс и Невис; Сейнт Лусия; Сейнт Мартин; Сен Пиер и Микелон; Сейнт Винсент и Гренадини; Судан; Суринам; Свалбард и Ян Майен; Швеция; Швейцария; Сао Томе и Принсипи; Тайван; Таджикистан; Танзания; Тайланд; Тимор-Лесте; Того; Токелау; Тонга; Тринидад и Тобаго; Тристан да Куня; Тунис; Туркменистан; Острови Търкс и Кайкос; Тувалу; Турция; Малки далечни острови на САЩ; Уганда; Украйна; Обединени арабски емирства; Обединеното кралство; Съединени щати; Уругвай; Узбекистан; Вануату; Ватикана; Венецуела; Виетнам; Уолис и Футуна; Западна Сахара; Йемен; Замбия; Зимбабве; Оландски острови; Други
ro-RO: Țară: Afganistan; Albania; Algeria; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antigua & Barbuda; Argentina; Armenia; Aruba; Ascension Island; Australia; Austria; Azerbaidjan; Bahamas; Bahrain; Bangladesh; Barbados; Belarus; Belgia; Belize; Benin; Bermuda; Bhutan; Bolivia; Bosnia și Herțegovina; Botswana; Brazilia; Teritoriul Britanic din Oceanul Indian; Insulele Virgine Britanice; Brunei; Bulgaria; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Cambodgia; Camerun; Canada; Capul Verde; Țările de Jos Caraibiene; Insulele Cayman; Republica Centrafricană; Ciad; Chile; China; Insula Crăciunului; Insulele Cocos (Keeling).; Columbia; Comore; Congo - Brazzaville; Congo - Kinshasa; Insulele Cook; Costa Rica; Croația; Curaçao; Cipru; Cehia; Coasta de Fildeș; Danemarca; Djibouti; Dominica; Republica Dominicană; Ecuador; Egipt; El Salvador; Guineea Ecuatorială; Eritreea; Estonia; Eswatini; Etiopia; Insulele Falkland; Insulele Feroe; Fiji; Finlanda; Franța; Guyana Franceză; Polinezia Franceză; Teritoriile australe franceze; Gabon; Gambia; Georgia; Germania; Ghana; Gibraltar; Grecia; Groenlanda; Grenada; Guadelupa; Guatemala; Guernsey; Guineea; Guineea-Bissau; Guyana; Haiti; Honduras; Hong Kong SAR; Ungaria; Islanda; India; Indonezia; Irak; Irlanda; Insula Man; Israel; Italia; Jamaica; Japonia; Jersey; Iordania; Kazakhstan; Kenya; Kiribati; Kosovo; Kuwait; Kârgâzstan; Laos; Letonia; Liban; Lesotho; Liberia; Libia; Liechtenstein; Lituania; Luxemburg; Macao SAR; Madagascar; Malawi; Malaezia; Maldive; Mali; Malta; Martinica; Mauritania; Mauritius; Mayotte; Mexic; Moldova; Monaco; Mongolia; Muntenegru; Montserrat; Maroc; Mozambic; Myanmar (Birmania); Namibia; Nauru; Nepal; Țările de Jos; Noua Caledonie; Noua Zeelandă; Nicaragua; Niger; Nigeria; Niue; Insula Norfolk; Macedonia de Nord; Norvegia; Oman; Pakistan; Teritoriile Palestiniene; Panama; Papua Noua Guinee; Paraguay; Peru; Filipine; Insulele Pitcairn; Polonia; Portugalia; Qatar; România; Rusia; Rwanda; Réunion; Samoa; San Marino; Arabia Saudită; Senegal; Serbia; Seychelles; Sierra Leone; Singapore; Sint Maarten; Slovacia; Slovenia; Insulele Solomon; Somalia; Africa de Sud; Insulele Georgia de Sud și Sandwich de Sud; Coreea de Sud; Sudanul de Sud; Spania; Sri Lanka; St Barthélemy; Sfânta Elena; St Kitts & Nevis; Sf. Lucia; St Martin; St Pierre & Miquelon; St Vincent și Grenadinele; Sudan; Suriname; Svalbard și Jan Mayen; Suedia; Elveția; São Tomé și Príncipe; Taiwan; Tadjikistan; Tanzania; Tailanda; Timorul de Est; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad și Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunisia; Turkmenistan; Insulele Turks și Caicos; Tuvalu; Turcia; Insulele Minore Îndepărtate ale SUA; Uganda; Ucraina; Emiratele Arabe Unite; Regatul Unit; Statele Unite; Uruguay; Uzbekistan; Vanuatu; Vatican; Venezuela; Vietnam; Wallis & Futuna; Sahara de Vest; Yemen; Zambia; Zimbabwe; Insulele Åland; Altele
pt-PT: Country: Afeganistão; Albânia; Argélia; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antígua e Barbuda; Argentina; Arménia; Aruba; Ilha de Ascensão; Austrália; Áustria; Azerbaijão; Bahamas; Barém; Bangladexe; Barbados; Bielorrússia; Bélgica; Belize; Benim; Bermudas; Butão; Bolívia; Bósnia e Herzegovina; Botsuana; Brasil; Território Britânico do Oceano Índico; Ilhas Virgens Britânicas; Brunei; Bulgária; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Camboja; Camarões; Canadá; Cabo Verde; Holanda caribenha; Ilhas Cayman; República Centro-Africana; Chade; Chile; China; Ilha do Natal; Ilhas Cocos (Keeling); Colômbia; Comores; Congo – Brazzaville; Congo – Kinshasa; Ilhas Cook; Costa Rica; Croácia; Curaçao; Chipre; Chéquia; Costa do Marfim; Dinamarca; Jibuti; Domínica; República Dominicana; Equador; Egito; El Salvador; Guiné Equatorial; Eritreia; Estónia; Essuatíni; Etiópia; Ilhas Falkland; Ilhas Faroe; Fiji; Finlândia; França; Guiana Francesa; Polinésia Francesa; Territórios Franceses do Sul; Gabão; Gâmbia; Geórgia; Alemanha; Gana; Gibraltar; Grécia; Gronelândia; Granada; Guadalupe; Guatemala; Guernsey; Guiné; Guiné-Bissau; Guiana; Haiti; Honduras; Hong Kong SAR; Hungria; Islândia; Índia; Indonésia; Iraque; Irlanda; Ilha de Man; Israel; Itália; Jamaica; Japão; Jersey; Jordânia; Cazaquistão; Quénia; Quiribáti; Kosovo; Koweit; Quirguistão; Laos; Letónia; Líbano; Lesoto; Libéria; Líbia; Listenstaine; Lituânia; Luxemburgo; Macau SAR; Madagáscar; Maláui; Malásia; Maldivas; Mali; Malta; Martinique; Mauritânia; Maurícia; Mayotte; México; Moldávia; Mónaco; Mongólia; Montenegro; Montserrat; Marrocos; Moçambique; Myanmar (Burma); Namíbia; Nauru; Nepal; Países Baixos; Nova Caledónia; Nova Zelândia; Nicarágua; Níger; Nigéria; Niue; Ilha Norfolk; Macedônia do Norte; Noruega; Omã; Paquistão; Territórios Palestinos; Panamá; Papua-Nova Guiné; Paraguai; Peru; Filipinas; Ilhas Pitcairn; Polónia; Portugal; Catar; Roménia; Rússia; Ruanda; Reunião; Samoa; São Marinho; Arábia Saudita; Senegal; Sérvia; Seicheles; Serra Leoa; Singapura; Sint Maarten; Eslováquia; Eslovénia; Ilhas Salomão; Somália; África do Sul; Geórgia do Sul e Ilhas Sandwich do Sul; Coreia do Sul; Sudão do Sul; Espanha; Seri Lanca; São Bartolomeu; Santa Helena; São Cristóvão e Nevis; Sant Lúcia; São Martinho; São Pedro e Miquelon; São Vicente e Granadinas; Sudão; Suriname; Svalbard e Jan Mayen; Suécia; Suíça; São Tomé e Príncipe; Taiwan; Tajiquistão; Tanzânia; Tailândia; Timor-Leste; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidade e Tobago; Tristão da Cunha; Tunísia; Turquemenistão; Ilhas Turcas e Caicos; Tuvalu; Turquia; Ilhas Distantes dos EUA; Uganda; Ucrânia; Emirados Árabes Unidos; Reino Unido; Estados Unidos; Uruguai; Usbequistão; Vanuatu; Cidade do Vaticano; Venezuela; Vietname; Wallis e Futuna; Saara Ocidental; Iémen; Zâmbia; Zimbábue; Ilhas Åland; Outro
el: Χώρα: Αφγανιστάν; Αλβανία; Αλγερία; Ανδόρα; Αγκόλα; Ανγκουίλα; Αντίγκουα και Μπαρμπούντα; Αργεντίνη; Αρμενία; Αρούμπα; Νήσος Αναλήψεως; Αυστραλία; Αυστρία; Αζερμπαϊτζάν; Μπαχάμες; Μπαχρέιν; Μπαγκλαντές; Μπαρμπάντος; Λευκορωσία; Βέλγιο; Μπελίζ; Μπενίν; Βερμούδα; Μπουτάν; Βολιβία; Βοσνία-Ερζεγοβίνη; Μποτσουάνα; Βραζιλία; Βρετανική Επικράτεια Ινδικού Ωκεανού; Βρετανικές Παρθένοι Νήσοι; Μπρουνέι; Βουλγαρία; Μπουρκίνα Φάσο; Μπουρούντι; Καμπότζη; Καμερούν; Καναδάς; Πράσινο Ακρωτήριο; Καραϊβική Ολλανδία; Νήσοι Κέιμαν; Κεντροαφρικανική Δημοκρατία; Τσαντ; Χιλή; Κίνα; Νήσος των Χριστουγέννων; Νήσοι Κόκος (Κίλινγκ); Κολομβία; Κομόρες; Κονγκό - Μπραζαβίλ; Κονγκό - Κινσάσα; Νήσοι Κουκ; Κόστα Ρίκα; Κροατία; Κουρασάο; Κύπρος; Τσεχία; Ακτή Ελεφαντοστού; Δανία; Τζιμπουτί; Δομίνικα; Δομινικανή Δημοκρατία; Εκουαδόρ; Αίγυπτος; Ελ Σαλβαδόρ; Ισημερινή Γουινέα; Ερυθραία; Εσθονία; Εσουατίνι; Αιθιοπία; Νήσοι Φώκλαντ; Νήσοι Φερόε; Φίτζι; Φινλανδία; Γαλλία; Γαλλική Γουιάνα; Γαλλική Πολυνησία; Γαλλικά Νότια Εδάφη; Γκαμπόν; Γκάμπια; Γεωργία; Γερμανία; Γκάνα; Γιβραλτάρ; Ελλάδα; Γροιλανδία; Γρενάδα; Γουαδελούπη; Γουατεμάλα; Γκέρνσεϊ; Γουινέα; Γουινέα-Μπισάου; Γουιάνα; Αϊτή; Ονδούρα; ΕΔΠ Χονγκ Κονγκ; Ουγγαρία; Ισλανδία; Ινδία; Ινδονησία; Ιράκ; Ιρλανδία; Νήσος του Μαν; Ισραήλ; Ιταλία; Τζαμάικα; Ιαπωνία; Τζέρσεϊ; Ιορδανία; Καζακστάν; Κενύα; Κιριμπάτι; Κοσσυφοπέδιο; Κουβέιτ; Κιργιζία; Λάος; Λετονία; Λίβανος; Λεσότο; Λιβερία; Λιβύη; Λιχτενστάιν; Λιθουανία; Λουξεμβούργο; ΕΔΠ Μακάο; Μαδαγασκάρη; Μαλάουι; Μαλαισία; Μαλδίβες; Μάλι; Μάλτα; Μαρτινίκα; Μαυριτανία; Μαυρίκιος; Μαγιότ; Μεξικό; Μολδαβία; Μονακό; Μογγολία; Μαυροβούνιο; Μονσεράτ; Μαρόκο; Μοζαμβίκη; Μιανμάρ (Βιρμανία); Ναμίμπια; Ναούρου; Νεπάλ; Ολλανδία; Νέα Καληδονία; Νέα Ζηλανδία; Νικαράγουα; Νίγηρας; Νιγηρία; Νίουε; Νήσος Νόρφολκ; Βόρεια Μακεδονία; Νορβηγία; Ομάν; Πακιστάν; Παλαιστινιακά Εδάφη; Παναμάς; Παπούα Νέα Γουινέα; Παραγουάη; Περού; Φιλιππίνες; Νήσοι Πίτκερν; Πολωνία; Πορτογαλία; Κατάρ; Ρουμανία; Ρωσία; Ρουάντα; Ρεουνιόν; Σαμόα; Άγιος Μαρίνος; Σαουδική Αραβία; Σενεγάλη; Σερβία; Σεϋχέλλες; Σιέρα Λεόνε; Singapore; Άγιος Μαρτίνος; Σλοβακία; Σλοβενία; Νήσοι Σολομώντα; Σομαλία; Νότια Αφρική; Νήσοι Νότιας Γεωργίας και Νότιων Σάντουιτς; Νότια Κορέα; Νότιο Σουδάν; Ισπανία; Σρι Λάνκα; Άγιος Βαρθολομαίος; Αγία Ελένη; Σεντ Κιτς και Νέβις; Αγία Λουκία; Άγιος Μαρτίνος; Σεντ Πιερ και Μικελόν; Άγιος Βικέντιος και Γρεναδίνες; Σουδάν; Σουρινάμ; Σβάλμπαρντ και Γιαν Μάγιεν; Σουηδία; Ελβετία; Σάο Τομέ και Πρίνσιπε; Ταϊβάν; Τατζικιστάν; Τανζανία; Σιάμ; Ανατολικό Τιμόρ; Τόγκο; Τοκελάου; Τόνγκα; Τρινιντάντ και Τομπάγκο; Τριστάν ντα Κούνια; Τυνησία; Τουρκμενιστάν; Νήσοι Τερκς και Κάικος; Τουβαλού; Τουρκία; Απομακρυσμένες Νήσοι των ΗΠΑ; Ουγκάντα; Ουκρανία; Ηνωμένα Αραβικά Εμιράτα; Ηνωμένο Βασίλειο; Ηνωμένες Πολιτείες; Ουρουγουάη; Ουζμπεκιστάν; Βανουάτου; Πόλη του Βατικανού; Βενεζουέλα; Βιετνάμ; Γουάλις και Φουτούνα; Δυτική Σαχάρα; Υέμενη; Ζάμπια; Ζιμπάμπουε; Νήσοι Ώλαντ; Άλλο
nb: Country: Afghanistan; Albania; Algeria; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antigua og Barbuda; Argentina; Armenia; Aruba; Ascension-øya; Australia; Austria; Azerbaijan; Bahamas; Bahrain; Bangladesh; Barbados; Belarus; Belgia; Belize; Benin; Bermuda; Bhutan; Bolivia; Bosnia-Hercegovina; Botswana; Brasil; Det britiske territoriet i Indiahavet; De britiske jomfruøyer; Brunei; Bulgaria; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Kambodsja; Kamerun; Canada; Kapp Verde; Karibisk Nederland; Caymanøyene; Den sentralafrikanske republikk; Tsjad; Chile; Kina; Christmasøya; Kokosøyene (Keeling); Colombia; Komorene; Kongo-Brazzaville; Kongo-Kinshasa; Cookøyene; Costa Rica; Kroatia; Curaçao; Kypros; Tsjekkia; Elfenbenskysten; Danmark; Djibouti; Dominica; Den dominikanske republikk; Ecuador; Egypt; El Salvador; Ekvatorial Guinea; Eritrea; Estland; Eswatini; Etiopia; Falklandsøyene; Færøyene; Fiji; Finland; Frankrike; Fransk Guyana; Fransk Polynesia; Franske sørlige territorier; Gabon; Gambia; Georgia; Tyskland; Ghana; Gibraltar; Hellas; Grønland; Grenada; Guadeloupe; Guatemala; Guernsey; Guinea; Guinea-Bissau; Guyana; Haiti; Honduras; Hong Kong SAR; Ungarn; Island; India; Indonesia; Irak; Irland; Isle of Man; Israel; Italia; Jamaica; Japan; Jersey; Jordan; Kazakhstan; Kenya; Kiribati; Kosovo; Kuwait; Kyrgyzstan; Laos; Latvia; Libanon; Lesotho; Liberia; Libya; Liechtenstein; Litauen; Luxembourg; Macao SAR; Madagaskar; Malawi; Malaysia; Maldivene; Mali; Malta; Martinique; Mauritania; Mauritius; Mayotte; Mexico; Moldova; Monaco; Mongolia; Montenegro; Montserrat; Morocco; Mosambik; Myanmar (Burma); Namibia; Nauru; Nepal; Nederland; Ny Caledonia; New Zealand; Nicaragua; Niger; Nigeria; Niue; Norfolkøya; Nord-Makedonia; Norge; Oman; Pakistan; Palestinske territorier; Panama; Papua Ny-Guinea; Paraguay; Peru; Filippinene; Pitcairnøyene; Polen; Portugal; Qatar; Romania; Russland; Rwanda; Réunion; Samoa; San Marino; Saudi-Arabia; Senegal; Serbia; Seychellene; Sierra Leone; Singapore; Sint Maarten; Slovakia; Slovenia; Solomonøyene; Somalia; Sør-Afrika; Sør-Georgia og Sør-Sandwichøyene; Sør-Korea; Sør-Sudan; Spania; Sri Lanka; Saint-Barthélemy; Sankt Helena; Saint Kitts og Nevis; Saint Lucia; Saint Martin; Saint Pierre og Miquelon; Saint Vincent og Grenadinene; Sudan; Surinam; Svalbard og Jan Mayen; Sverige; Sveits; São Tomé og Príncipe; Taiwan; Tajikistan; Tanzania; Thailand; Timor-Leste; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad og Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunisia; Turkmenistan; Turks- og Caicosøyene; Tuvalu; Türkiye; USAs ytre øyer; Uganda; Ukraina; De forente arabiske emirater; Storbritannia; USA; Uruguay; Uzbekistan; Vanuatu; Vatikanet; Venezuela; Vietnam; Wallis og Futuna; Vest-Sahara; Jemen; Zambia; Zimbabwe; Ålandsøyene; Annet
nl: Land: Afghanistan; Albanië; Algerije; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antigua & Barbuda; Argentinië; Armenië; Aruba; Ascension Eiland; Australië; Oostenrijk; Azerbaijan; Bahama's; Bahrein; Bangladesh; Barbados; Belarus; België; Belize; Benin; Bermuda; Bhutan; Bolivia; Bosnië-Herzegovina; Botswana; Brazilië; Brits Indisch Oceaangebied; Britse Maagdeneilanden; Brunei; Bulgarije; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Cambodja; Kameroen; Canada; Kaapverdië; Caribisch Nederland; Kaaiman Eilanden; Centraal Afrikaanse Republiek; Tsjaad; Chili; China; Kersteiland; Cocos Eilanden (Keeling); Colombia; Comoren; Congo - Brazzaville; Congo - Kinshasa; Cook Eilanden; Costa Rica; Kroatië; Curaçao; Cyprus; Tsjechië; Ivoorkust; Denemarken; Djibouti; Dominica; Dominicaanse Republiek; Ecuador; Egypte; El Salvador; Equatoriaal-Guinea; Eritrea; Estland; Eswatini; Ethiopië; Falkland Eilanden; Faeröer Eilanden; Fiji; Finland; Frankrijk; Frans-Guyana; Frans-Polynesië; Franse zuidelijke gebieden; Gabon; Gambia; Georgië; Duitsland; Ghana; Gibraltar; Griekenland; Groenland; Grenada; Guadeloupe; Guatemala; Guernsey; Guinea; Guinea-Bissau; Guyana; Haïti; Honduras; Hong Kong SAR; Hongarije; IJsland; India; Indonesië; Irak; Ierland; Eiland Man; Israël; Italië; Jamaica; Japan; Jersey; Jordanië; Kazachstan; Kenia; Kiribati; Kosovo; Koeweit; Kirgizië; Laos; Letland; Libanon; Lesotho; Liberia; Libië; Liechtenstein; Litouwen; Luxemburg; Macao SAR; Madagascar; Malawi; Maleisië; Maldiven; Mali; Malta; Martinique; Mauritanië; Mauritius; Mayotte; Mexico; Moldavië; Monaco; Mongolië; Montenegro; Montserrat; Marokko; Mozambique; Myanmar (Birma); Namibië; Nauru; Nepal; Nederland; Nieuw-Caledonië; Nieuw-Zeeland; Nicaragua; Niger; Nigeria; Niue; Norfolk Eiland; Noord-Macedonië; Noorwegen; Oman; Pakistan; Palestijnse grondgebieden; Panama; Papoea-Nieuw-Guinea; Paraguay; Peru; Filippijnen; Pitcairn Eilanden; Polen; Portugal; Qatar; Roemenië; Rusland; Rwanda; Réunion; Samoa; San Marino; Saoedi-Arabië; Senegal; Servië; Seychellen; Sierra Leone; Singapore; Sint Maarten; Slowakije; Slovenië; Solomon-eilanden; Somalië; Zuid-Afrika; Zuid-Georgië & Zuid-Sandwicheilanden; Zuid-Korea; Zuid Soedan; Spanje; Sri Lanka; St Barthélemy; St Helena; St. Kitts & Nevis; St Lucia; St Martin; St Pierre & Miquelon; St Vincent & de Grenadines; Soedan; Suriname; Spitsbergen & Jan Mayen; Zweden; Zwitserland; São Tomé & Príncipe; Taiwan; Tadzjikistan; Tanzania; Thailand; Timor-Leste; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad & Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunesië; Turkmenistan; Turks- & Caicoseilanden; Tuvalu; Turkije; Amerikaanse afgelegen eilanden; Oeganda; Oekraïne; Verenigde Arabische Emiraten; Verenigd Koninkrijk; Verenigde Staten; Uruguay; Oezbekistan; Vanuatu; Vaticaanstad; Venezuela; Vietnam; Wallis & Futuna; Westelijke Sahara; Jemen; Zambia; Zimbabwe; Åland Eilanden; Andere
pt-BR: País: Afeganistão; Albânia; Argélia; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antígua e Barbuda; Argentina; Armênia; Aruba; Ilha de Ascensão; Austrália; Áustria; Azerbaijão; Bahamas; Bahrein; Bangladesh; Barbados; Bielorrússia; Bélgica; Belize; Benin; Bermudas; Butão; Bolívia; Bósnia e Herzegovina; Botswana; Brasil; Território Britânico do Oceano Índico; Ilhas Virgens Britânicas; Brunei; Bulgária; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Camboja; Camarões; Canadá; Cabo Verde; Caribe Holandês; Ilhas Cayman; República Centro-Africana; Chade; Chile; China; Ilha Christmas; Ilhas Cocos (Keeling); Colômbia; Comores; Congo - Brazzaville; Congo - Kinshasa; Ilhas Cook; Costa Rica; Croácia; Curaçao; Chipre; Tchéquia; Côte d'Ivoire; Dinamarca; Djibouti; Dominica; República Dominicana; Equador; Egito; El Salvador; Guiné Equatorial; Eritreia; Estônia; Essuatíni; Etiópia; Ilhas Malvinas (Ilhas Falkland); Ilhas Faroé; Fiji; Finlândia; França; Guiana Francesa; Polinésia Francesa; Terras Austrais e Antárticas Francesas; Gabão; Gâmbia; Geórgia; Alemanha; Gana; Gibraltar; Grécia; Groenlândia; Granada; Guadalupe; Guatemala; Guernsey; Guiné; Guiné-Bissau; Guiana; Haiti; Honduras; Região Administrativa Especial de Hong Kong; Hungria; Islândia; Índia; Indonésia; Iraque; Irlanda; Ilha de Man; Israel; Itália; Jamaica; Japão; Jersey; Jordânia; Cazaquistão; Quênia; Quiribáti; Kosovo; Kuwait; Quirguistão; Laos; Letônia; Líbano; Lesoto; Libéria; Líbia; Liechtenstein; Lituânia; Luxemburgo; Região Administrativa Especial de Macau; Madagascar; Malaui; Malásia; Maldivas; Mali; Malta; Martinica; Mauritânia; Maurício; Mayotte; México; Moldova; Mônaco; Mongólia; Montenegro; Montserrat; Marrocos; Moçambique; Myanmar (Burma); Namíbia; Nauru; Nepal; Holanda; Nova Caledônia; Nova Zelândia; Nicarágua; Níger; Nigéria; Niue; Ilha Norfolk; Macedônia do Norte; Noruega; Omã; Paquistão; Territórios Palestinos; Panamá; Papua Nova Guiné; Paraguai; Peru; Filipinas; Ilhas Pitcairn; Polônia; Portugal; Catar; Romênia; Rússia; Ruanda; Ilha da Reunião; Samoa; San Marino; Arábia Saudita; Senegal; Sérvia; Seicheles; Serra Leoa; Cingapura; St. Maarten; Eslováquia; Eslovênia; Ilhas Salomão; Somália; África do Sul; Ilhas Geórgia do Sul e Sandwich do Sul; Coreia do Sul; Sudão do Sul; Espanha; Sri Lanka; São Bartolomeu; Santa Helena; São Cristóvão e Nevis; Santa Lúcia; São Martinho; São Pedro e Miquelão; São Vicente e Granadinas; Sudão; Suriname; Svalbard e Jan Mayen; Suécia; Suíça; São Tomé e Príncipe; Taiwan; Tadjiquistão; Tanzânia; Tailândia; Timor-Leste; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad e Tobago; Tristão da Cunha; Tunísia; Turcomenistão; Ilhas Turks e Caicos; Tuvalu; Türkiye; Ilhas Menores Distantes dos EUA; Uganda; Ucrânia; Emirados Árabes Unidos; Reino Unido; Estados Unidos; Uruguai; Uzbequistão; Vanuatu; Cidade do Vaticano; Venezuela; Vietnã; Wallis e Futuna; Saara Ocidental; Iêmen; Zâmbia; Zimbábue; Ilhas Aland; Outro
sk-SK: Krajina: Afganistan; Albánsko; Alžírsko; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antigua a Barbuda; Argentína; Arménsko; Aruba; Ostrov Ascension; Austrália; Rakúsko; Azerbajdžan; Bahamy; Bahrajn; Bangladéš; Barbados; Bielorusko; Belgicko; Belize; Benin; Bermudy; Bhután; Bolívia; Bosna a Hercegovina; Botswana; Brazília; Britské indickooceánske územie; Britské Panenské ostrovy; Brunei; Bulharsko; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Kambodža; Kamerun; Kanada; Kapverdy; Karibské Holandsko; Kajmanie ostrovy; Stredoafrická republika; Čad; Čile; Čína; Vianočný ostrov; Kokosové (Keelingove) ostrovy; Kolumbia; Komory; Kongo – Brazzaville; Kongo - Kinshasa; Cookove ostrovy; Kostarika; Chorvátsko; Curaçao; Cyprus; Česko; Pobrežie Slonoviny; Dánsko; Džibutsko; Dominika; Dominikánska republika; Ekvádor; Egypt; El Salvador; Rovníková Guinea; Eritrea; Estónsko; Eswatini; Etiópia; Falklandské ostrovy; Faerské ostrovy; Fidži; Fínsko; Francúzsko; Francúzska Guyana; Francúzska Polynézia; Francúzske južné územia; Gabon; Gambia; Gruzínsko; Nemecko; Ghana; Gibraltar; Grécko; Grónsko; Grenada; Guadeloupe; Guatemala; Guernsey; Guinea; Guinea-Bissau; Guyana; Haiti; Honduras; Hongkong SAR; Maďarsko; Island; India; Indonézia; Irak; Írsko; Ostrov Man; Izrael; Taliansko; Jamajka; Japonsko; Jersey; Jordánsko; Kazachstan; Keňa; Kiribati; Kosovo; Kuvajt; Kirgizsko; Laos; Lotyšsko; Libanon; Lesotho; Libéria; Líbya; Lichtenštajnsko; Litva; Luxembursko; Macao SAR; Madagaskar; Malawi; Malajzia; Maldivy; Mali; Malta; Martinik; Mauritánia; Maurícius; Mayotte; Mexiko; Moldavsko; Monako; Mongolsko; Čierna Hora; Montserrat; Maroko; Mozambik; Mjanmarsko (Barma); Namíbia; Nauru; Nepál; Holandsko; Nová Kaledónia; Nový Zéland; Nikaragua; Niger; Nigéria; Niue; Ostrov Norfolk; Severné Macedónsko; Nórsko; Omán; Pakistan; Palestínske územia; Panama; Papua Nová Guinea; Paraguaj; Peru; Filipíny; Pitcairnove ostrovy; Poľsko; Portugalsko; Katar; Rumunsko; Rusko; Rwanda; Réunion; Samoa; San Marino; Saudská Arábia; Senegal; Srbsko; Seychely; Sierra Leone; Singapur; Svätý Martin; Slovensko; Slovinsko; Šalamúnove ostrovy; Somálsko; Južná Afrika; Južná Georgia a Južné Sandwichove ostrovy; Južná Kórea; Južný Sudán; Španielsko; Srí Lanka; Svätý Bartolomej; Svätá Helena; Svätý Krištof a Nevis; Svätá Lucia; Svätý Martin; Svätý Pierre a Miquelon; Svätý Vincent a Grenadíny; Sudán; Surinam; Svalbard a Jan Mayen; Švédsko; Švajčiarsko; Svätý Tomáš a Princov ostrov; Taiwan; Tadžikistan; Tanzánia; Thajsko; Východný Timor; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad a Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunisko; Turkménsko; Ostrovy Turks a Caicos; Tuvalu; Turecko; Odľahlé ostrovy USA; Uganda; Ukrajina; Spojené arabské emiráty; Spojené kráľovstvo; Spojené štáty americké; Uruguaj; Uzbekistan; Vanuatu; Vatikán; Venezuela; Vietnam; Wallis a Futuna; Západná Sahara; Jemen; Zambia; Zimbabwe; Alandy; Iné
zh-CN: 国家/地区: 阿富汗; 阿尔巴尼亚; 阿尔及利亚; 安道尔; 安哥拉; 安圭拉; 安提瓜和巴布达; 阿根廷; 亚美尼亚; 阿鲁巴; 阿森松岛; 澳洲; 奥地利; 阿塞拜疆; 巴哈马; 巴林; 孟加拉国; 巴巴多斯; 白俄罗斯; 比利时; 伯利兹; 贝宁; 百慕大; 不丹; 玻利维亚; 波斯尼亚和黑塞哥维那; 博茨瓦纳; 巴西; 英属印度洋领地; 英属维尔京群岛; 文莱; 保加利亚; 布基纳法索; 布隆迪; 柬埔寨; 喀麦隆; 加拿大; 佛得角; 荷属加勒比; 开曼群岛; 中非共和国; 乍得; 智利; 中国; 圣诞岛; 科科斯（基林）群岛; 哥伦比亚; 科摩罗; 刚果共和国; 刚果民主共和国; 库克群岛; 哥斯达黎加; 克罗地亚; 库拉索; 塞浦路斯; 捷克; 科特迪瓦; 丹麦; 吉布提; 多米尼加; 多明尼加共和国; 厄瓜多尔; 埃及; 萨尔瓦多; 赤道几内亚; 厄立特里亚; 爱沙尼亚; 斯威士兰; 埃塞俄比亚; 福克兰群岛; 法罗群岛; 斐济; 芬兰; 法国; 法属圭亚那; 法属波利尼西亚; 法属南部领地; 加蓬; 冈比亚; 乔治亚州; 德国; 加纳; 直布罗陀; 希腊; 格陵兰; 格林纳达; 瓜德罗普岛; 危地马拉; 根西岛; 几内亚; 几内亚比绍; 圭亚那; 海地; 洪都拉斯; 香港特别行政区; 匈牙利; 冰岛; 印度; 印度尼西亚; 伊拉克; 爱尔兰; 马恩岛; 以色列; 意大利; 牙买加; 日本; 泽西岛; 约旦; 哈萨克斯坦; 肯尼亚; 基里巴斯; 科索沃; 科威特; 吉尔吉斯斯坦; 老挝; 拉脱维亚; 黎巴嫩; 莱索托; 利比里亚; 利比亚; 列支敦士登; 立陶宛; 卢森堡; 澳门特别行政区; 马达加斯加; 马拉维; 马来西亚; 马尔代夫; 马里; 马耳他; 马提尼克岛; 毛里塔尼亚; 毛里求斯; 马约特岛; 墨西哥; 摩尔多瓦; 摩纳哥; 蒙古; 黑山; 蒙特塞拉特岛; 摩洛哥; 莫桑比克; 缅甸; 纳米比亚; 瑙鲁; 尼泊尔; 荷兰; 新喀里多尼亚; 新西兰; 尼加拉瓜; 尼日尔; 尼日利亚; 纽埃; 诺福克岛; 北马其顿; 挪威; 阿曼; 巴基斯坦; 巴勒斯坦领土; 巴拿马; 巴布亚新几内亚; 巴拉圭; 秘鲁; 菲律宾; 皮特凯恩群岛; 波兰; 葡萄牙; 卡塔尔; 罗马尼亚; 俄罗斯; 卢旺达; 留尼汪; 萨摩亚; 圣马力诺; 沙特阿拉伯; 塞内加尔; 塞尔维亚; 塞舌尔; 塞拉利昂; 新加坡; 圣马丁; 斯洛伐克; 斯洛文尼亚; 所罗门群岛; 索马里; 南非; 南乔治亚和南桑威奇群岛; 韩国; 南苏丹; 西班牙; 斯里兰卡; 圣巴泰勒米; 圣赫勒拿岛; 圣基茨和尼维斯; 圣卢西亚; 圣马丁岛; 圣皮埃尔和密克隆; 圣文森特和格林纳丁斯; 苏丹; 苏里南; 斯瓦尔巴和扬马延; 瑞典; 瑞士; 圣多美和普林西比; 台湾; 塔吉克斯坦; 坦桑尼亚; 泰国; 东帝汶; 多哥; 托克劳; 汤加; 特立尼达和多巴哥; 特里斯坦-达库尼亚; 突尼斯; 土库曼斯坦; 特克斯和凯科斯群岛; 图瓦卢; 土耳其; 美国本土外小岛屿; 乌干达; 乌克兰; 阿拉伯联合酋长国; 英国; 美国; 乌拉圭; 乌兹别克斯坦; 瓦努阿图; 梵蒂冈城国; 委内瑞拉; 越南; 瓦利斯和富图纳群岛; 西撒哈拉; 也门; 赞比亚; 津巴布韦; 奥兰群岛; 其他
hr-HR: Država: Afganistan; Albanija; Alžir; Andora; Angola; Anguilla; Antigva i Barbuda; Argentina; Armenija; Aruba; Otok Ascension; Australija; Austrija; Azerbejdžan; Bahami; Bahrein; Bangladeš; Barbados; Bjelorusija; Belgija; Belize; Benin; Bermuda; Butan; Bolivija; Bosna i Hercegovina; Bocvana; Brazil; Britanski indijskooceanski teritorij; Britanski Djevičanski otoci; Brunej; Bugarska; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Kambodža; Kamerun; Kanada; Kapverdski Otoci; Karipski otoci Nizozemske; Kajmanski otoci; Srednjoafrička Republika; Čad; Čile; Kina; Božićni otok; Kokosovi otoci; Kolumbija; Komori; Kongo – Brazzaville; Kongo – Kinshasa; Cookovi otoci; Kostarika; Hrvatska; Curaçao; Cipar; Češka; Obala Bjelokosti; Danska; Džibuti; Dominika; Dominikanska Republika; Ekvador; Egipat; El Salvador; Ekvatorska Gvineja; Eritreja; Estonija; Esvatini; Etiopija; Falklandski otoci; Farski otoci; Fiji; Finska; Francuska; Francuska Gvajana; Francuska Polinezija; Francuski južni teritoriji; Gabon; Gambija; Gruzija; Njemačka; Gana; Gibraltar; Grčka; Grenland; Grenada; Guadeloupe; Gvatemala; Guernsey; Gvineja; Gvineja Bisau; Gvajana; Haiti; Honduras; Hong Kong SAR; Mađarska; Island; Indija; Indonezija; Irak; Irska; Man; Izrael; Italija; Jamajka; Japan; Jersey; Jordan; Kazahstan; Kenija; Kiribati; Kosovo; Kuvajt; Kirgistan; Laos; Latvija; Libanon; Lesoto; Liberija; Libija; Liechtenstein; Litva; Luksemburg; Macao SAR; Madagaskar; Malavi; Malezija; Maldivi; Mali; Malta; Martinique; Mauritanija; Mauricijus; Mayotte; Meksiko; Moldavija; Monako; Mongolija; Crna Gora; Montserrat; Maroko; Mozambik; Mjanmar (Burma); Namibija; Nauru; Nepal; Nizozemska; Nova Kaledonija; Novi Zeland; Nikaragva; Niger; Nigerija; Niue; Otok Norfolk; Sjeverna Makedonija; Norveška; Oman; Pakistan; Palestinska područja; Panama; Papua Nova Gvineja; Paragvaj; Peru; Filipini; Pitcairn; Poljska; Portugal; Katar; Rumunjska; Rusija; Ruanda; Réunion; Samoa; San Marino; Saudijska Arabija; Senegal; Srbija; Sejšeli; Sijera Leone; Singapur; Sint Maarten; Slovačka; Slovenija; Solomonski Otoci; Somalija; Južnoafrička Republika; Južna Georgia i otočje Južni Sandwich; Južna Koreja; Južni Sudan; Španjolska; Šri Lanka; Saint-Barthélemy; Sveta Helena; Sveti Kristofor i Nevis; Sveta Lucija; Saint-Martin; Saint-Pierre-et-Miquelon; Sveti Vincent i Grenadini; Sudan; Surinam; Svalbard i Jan Mayen; Švedska; Švicarska; San Tome i Prinsipe; Tajvan; Tadžikistan; Tanzanija; Tajland; Istočni Timor; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad i Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunis; Turkmenistan; Otočja Turks i Caicos; Tuvalu; Turska; Udaljeni otoci SAD-a; Uganda; Ukrajina; Ujedinjeni Arapski Emirati; Ujedinjeno Kraljevstvo; Sjedinjene Države; Urugvaj; Uzbekistan; Vanuatu; Vatikan; Venezuela; Vijetnam; Wallis i Futuna; Zapadna Sahara; Jemen; Zambija; Zimbabve; Ålandski otoci; Ostalo
tr: Ülke: Afganistan; Arnavutluk; Cezayir; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antigua ve Barbuda; Arjantin; Ermenistan; Aruba; Ascension Adası; Avustralya; Avusturya; Azerbaycan; Bahamalar; Bahreyn; Bangladeş; Barbados; Belarus; Belçika; Belize; Benin; Bermuda; Bhutan; Bolivya; Bosna-Hersek; Botsvana; Brezilya; İngiliz Hint Okyanusu Bölgesi; İngiliz Virgin Adaları; Brunei; Bulgaristan; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Kamboçya; Kamerun; Kanada; Cape Verde; Karayip Hollandası; Cayman Adaları; Orta Afrika Cumhuriyeti; Çad; Şili; Çin; Christmas Adası; Cocos (Keeling) Adaları; Kolombiya; Komorlar; Kongo - Brazzaville; Kongo - Kinşasa; Cook Adaları; Kosta Rika; Hırvatistan; Curaçao; Kıbrıs; Çekya; Fildişi Sahili; Danimarka; Cibuti; Dominika; Dominik Cumhuriyeti; Ekvador; Mısır; El Salvador; Ekvator Ginesi; Eritre; Estonya; Esvatini; Etiyopya; Falkland Adaları; Faroe Adaları; Fiji; Finlandiya; Fransa; Fransız Guyanası; Fransız Polinezyası; Fransız Güney Toprakları; Gabon; Gambiya; Gürcistan; Almanya; Gana; Cebelitarık Boğazı; Yunanistan; Grönland; Grenada; Guadalupe; Guatemala; Guernsey; Gine; Gine-Bissau; Guyana; Haiti; Honduras; Hong Kong SAR; Macaristan; İzlanda; Hindistan; Endonezya; Irak; İrlanda; Man Adası; İsrail; İtalya; Jamaika; Japonya; Jersey; Ürdün; Kazakistan; Kenya; Kiribati; Kosova; Kuveyt; Kırgızistan; Laos; Letonya; Lübnan; Lesoto; Liberya; Libya; Lihtenştayn; Litvanya; Lüksemburg; Makao SAR; Madagaskar; Malavi; Malezya; Maldivler; Mali; Malta; Martinik; Moritanya; Mauritius; Mayotte; Meksika; Moldova; Monako; Moğolistan; Karadağ; Montserrat; Fas; Mozambik; Myanmar (Burma); Namibya; Nauru; Nepal; Hollanda; Yeni Kaledonya; Yeni Zelanda; Nikaragua; Nijer; Nijerya; Niue; Norfolk Adası; Kuzey Makedonya; Norveç; Umman; Pakistan; Filistin Bölgesi; Panama; Papua Yeni Gine; Paraguay; Peru; Filipinler; Pitcairn Adaları; Polonya; Portekiz; Katar; Romanya; Rusya; Ruanda; Réunion; Samoa; San Marino; Suudi Arabistan; Senegal; Sırbistan; Seyşeller; Sierra Leone; Singapur; Saint Martin; Slovakya; Slovenya; Solomon Adaları; Somali; Güney Afrika; Güney Georgia ve Güney Sandwich Adaları; Güney Kore; Güney Sudan; İspanya; Sri Lanka; St Barthélemy; St Helena; St Kitts ve Nevis; St Luçiya; St Martin Adası; St Pierre ve Miquelon; St Vincent ve Grenadinler; Sudan; Surinam; Svalbard ve Jan Mayen; İsveç; İsviçre; São Tomé ve Príncipe Demokratik Cumhuriyeti; Tayvan; Tacikistan; Tanzanya; Tayland; Doğu Timor; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad ve Tobago; Tristan da Cunha; Tunus; Türkmenistan; Turks ve Caicos Adaları; Tuvalu; Türkiye; ABD Dış Adaları; Uganda; Ukrayna; Birleşik Arap Emirlikleri; Birleşik Krallık; Amerika Birleşik Devletleri; Uruguay; Özbekistan; Vanuatu; Vatikan; Venezuela; Vietnam; Wallis ve Futuna; Batı Sahra; Yemen; Zambiya; Zimbabve; Åland Adaları; Diğer
es: País: Afganistán; Albania; Algeria; Andorra; Angola; Anguilla; Antigua y Barbuda; Argentina; Armenia; Aruba; Isla Ascensión; Australia; Austria; Azerbaiyán; Bahamas; Bahréin; Bangladesh; Barbados; Bielorrusia; Bélgica; Belice; Benín; Bermudas; Bután; Bolivia; Bosnia y Herzegovina; Botsuana; Brasil; Territorio Británico del Océano Índico; Islas Vírgenes Británicas; Brunéi; Bulgaria; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Camboya; Camerún; Canadá; Cabo Verde; Caribe Neerlandés; Islas Caimán; República Centroafricana; Chad; Chile; China; Isla Christmas; Islas Cocos; Colombia; Comoras; Congo - Brazzaville; Congo - Kinshasa; Islas Cook; Costa Rica; Croacia; Curaçao; Chipre; Chequia; Costa de Marfil; Dinamarca; Yibuti; Dominica; República Dominicana; Ecuador; Egipto; El Salvador; Guinea Ecuatorial; Eritrea; Estonia; Esuatini; Etiopía; Islas Malvinas; Islas Feroe; Fiyi; Finlandia; Francia; Guayana Francesa; Polinesia Francesa; Territorios Australes Franceses; Gabón; Gambia; Georgia; Alemania; Ghana; Gibraltar; Grecia; Groenlandia; Granada; Guadalupe; Guatemala; Guernsey; Guinea; Guinea-Bisáu; Guayana; Haití; Honduras; Hong Kong RAE; Hungría; Islandia; India; Indonesia; Iraq; Irlanda; Isla de Man; Israel; Italia; Jamaica; Japón; Jersey; Jordania; Kazajistán; Kenia; Kiribati; Kosovo; Kuwait; Kirguistán; Laos; Letonia; Líbano; Lesoto; Liberia; Libia; Liechtenstein; Lituania; Luxemburgo; Macao RAE; Madagascar; Malawi; Malasia; Maldivas; Mali; Malta; Martinica; Mauritania; Mauricio; Mayotte; México; Moldova; Mónaco; Mongolia; Montenegro; Montserrat; Marruecos; Mozambique; Myanmar (Birmania); Namibia; Nauru; Nepal; Países Bajos; Nueva Caledonia; Nueva Zelanda; Nicaragua; Níger; Nigeria; Niue; Isla Norfolk; Macedonia del norte; Noruega; Omán; Pakistán; Territorios Palestinos; Panamá; Papúa Nueva Guinea; Paraguay; Perú; Filipinas; Islas Pitcairn; Polonia; Portugal; Catar; Rumanía; Rusia; Ruanda; Reunión; Samoa; San Marino; Arabia Saudita; Senegal; Serbia; Seychelles; Sierra Leona; Singapur; Sint Maarten; Eslovaquia; Eslovenia; Islas Salomón; Somalia; Sudáfrica; Georgia del Sur e Islas Sandwich del Sur; Corea del Sur; Sudán del Sur; España; Sri Lanka; San Bartolomé; Santa Elena; San Cristóbal y Nieves; Santa Lucía; San Martín; San Pedro y Miquelón; San Vicente y las Granadinas; Sudán; Surinam; Svalbard y Jan Mayen; Suecia; Suiza; Santo Tomé y Príncipe; Taiwán; Tayikistán; Tanzania; Tailandia; Timor Oriental; Togo; Tokelau; Tonga; Trinidad y Tobago; Tristán da Cunha; Túnez; Turkmenistán; Islas Turcas y Caicos; Tuvalu; Turquía; Islas menores alejadas de los EE.UU.; Uganda; Ucrania; Emiratos Árabes Unidos; Reino Unido; Estados Unidos; Uruguay; Uzbekistán; Vanuatu; Ciudad del Vaticano; Venezuela; Vietnam; Wallis y Futuna; Sahara Occidental; Yemen; Zambia; Zimbabue; Islas Åland; Otros